2155 | confident (adjective): sure of yourself and not afraid | loc: magabiztos
  EN TS: That confident smile works.
  hu TS: Ez a magabiztos mosoly működik.
  EN FS: That nervous smile works.
  hu FS: Ez az ideges mosoly működik.
  EN TP: a confident half-smile
  hu TP: magabiztos félmosoly
  EN FP: a confident loud laugh
  hu FP: magabiztos hangos nevetés
2156 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: horizont
  EN TS: The sun sits on the horizon.
  hu TS: A nap a horizonton ül.
  EN FS: The moon sits on the horizon.
  hu FS: A hold a horizonton ül.
  EN TP: the sun on the horizon
  hu TP: a nap a horizonton
  EN FP: a ship on the horizon
  hu FP: hajó a horizonton
2157 | india (noun): a large country in South Asia | loc: India
  EN TS: A baby from India wears gold.
  hu TS: Egy Indiából származó baba aranyat visel.
  EN FS: A baby from India wears red.
  hu FS: Egy Indiából származó baba pirosat visel.
  EN TP: a painting from India
  hu TP: festmény Indiából
  EN FP: a carpet from India
  hu FP: szőnyeg Indiából
2158 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: fejkendő
  EN TS: Love the orange headscarf!
  hu TS: Imádom a narancssárga fejkendőt!
  EN FS: Love the blue headscarf!
  hu FS: Imádom a kék fejkendőt!
  EN TP: an orange headscarf
  hu TP: narancssárga fejkendő
  EN FP: taking off a headscarf
  hu FP: fejkendő levétele
2159 | majestic (adjective): grand and impressive, like a king | loc: fenséges
  EN TS: The cat feels very majestic.
  hu TS: A macska nagyon fenségesnek érzi magát.
  EN FS: The dog feels very majestic.
  hu FS: A kutya nagyon fenségesnek érzi magát.
  EN TP: a majestic cat
  hu TP: fenséges macska
  EN FP: a majestic lion
  hu FP: fenséges oroszlán
2161 | genius (noun): an exceptionally intelligent person | loc: zseni
  EN TS: The genius has a new idea.
  hu TS: A zseninek új ötlete van.
  EN FS: The genius has a new cat.
  hu FS: A zseninek új macskája van.
  EN TP: a genius gazing at stars
  hu TP: csillagokat bámuló zseni
  EN FP: a genius writing formulas
  hu FP: képleteket író zseni
2162 | ginger (adjective): having orange-red hair | loc: vörös hajú | translator note: loc adjective "vörös hajú" used as "vörös haj(a)" since the text is about the hair
  EN TS: Her ginger hair looks perfect.
  hu TS: Tökéletes a vörös haja.
  EN FS: Her black hair looks perfect.
  hu FS: Tökéletes a fekete haja.
  EN TP: long ginger hair in waves
  hu TP: hosszú, hullámos vörös haj
  EN FP: ginger hair in a bun
  hu FP: kontyba fogott vörös haj
2164 | woods (noun): an area of land covered with trees | loc: erdő
  EN TS: A path goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  hu TS: Egy ösvény vezet az erdőbe. Ki megy elsőként?
  EN FS: A river goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  hu FS: Egy folyó vezet az erdőbe. Ki megy elsőként?
  EN TP: a path through the woods
  hu TP: ösvény az erdőn át
  EN FP: a cabin in the woods
  hu FP: kunyhó az erdőben
2172 | sports car (noun): a fast low car built for speed and fun | loc: sportautó
  EN TS: A sports car in a paint storm.
  hu TS: Sportautó egy festékviharban.
  EN FS: A sports car in a snow storm.
  hu FS: Sportautó egy hóviharban.
  EN TP: a dark-blue sports car
  hu TP: sötétkék sportautó
  EN FP: a dark-blue family car
  hu FP: sötétkék családi autó
2174 | bloom (verb): to open flowers; to be full of flowers | loc: virágzik
  EN TS: A tree is blooming in snow!
  hu TS: Egy fa virágzik a hóban!
  EN FS: A tree is burning in snow!
  hu FS: Egy fa ég a hóban!
  EN TP: a tree blooming at night
  hu TP: éjjel virágzó fa
  EN FP: flowers blooming in spring
  hu FP: tavasszal virágzó virágok
2175 | midnight (noun): twelve o'clock at night | loc: éjfél
  EN TS: Midnight in the pine forest.
  hu TS: Éjfél a fenyőerdőben.
  EN FS: Midnight in the desert.
  hu FS: Éjfél a sivatagban.
  EN TP: midnight under the stars
  hu TP: éjfél a csillagok alatt
  EN FP: a party at midnight
  hu FP: buli éjfélkor
2176 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: sorok közti folyosó
  EN TS: It is raining in the aisle!
  hu TS: Esik az eső a sorok közti folyosón!
  EN FS: It is snowing in the aisle!
  hu FS: Esik a hó a sorok közti folyosón!
  EN TP: a rainy library aisle
  hu TP: esős könyvtári folyosó
  EN FP: a busy supermarket aisle
  hu FP: zsúfolt szupermarketfolyosó
2177 | dj (noun): someone who plays and mixes recorded music | loc: DJ
  EN TS: Even the moon came for the DJ!
  hu TS: Még a hold is eljött a DJ-ért!
  EN FS: Even the sun came for the DJ!
  hu FS: Még a nap is eljött a DJ-ért!
  EN TP: a DJ on the street
  hu TP: DJ az utcán
  EN FP: a DJ in a club
  hu FP: DJ egy klubban
2178 | peek (verb): to take a quick secret look from hiding | loc: kukucskálni
  EN TS: Psst, two cats are peeking.
  hu TS: Pszt, két macska kukucskál.
  EN FS: Psst, two dogs are peeking.
  hu FS: Pszt, két kutya kukucskál.
  EN TP: peeking behind leaves
  hu TP: kukucskálás a levelek mögül
  EN FP: peeking through a window
  hu FP: kukucskálás az ablakon át
2181 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: zsúfolt
  EN TS: The street is way too crowded.
  hu TS: Az utca durván zsúfolt.
  EN FS: The street is way too empty.
  hu FS: Az utca durván üres.
  EN TP: a crowded neon street
  hu TP: zsúfolt neonfényes utca
  EN FP: a crowded train carriage
  hu FP: zsúfolt vasúti kocsi
2182 | hiker (noun): a person who walks long distances in nature | loc: túrázó
  EN TS: The hiker has a red backpack.
  hu TS: A túrázónak piros hátizsákja van.
  EN FS: The hiker has a blue backpack.
  hu FS: A túrázónak kék hátizsákja van.
  EN TP: a hiker on a ledge
  hu TP: túrázó egy sziklapárkányon
  EN FP: a hiker in a tent
  hu FP: túrázó egy sátorban
2184 | roar (verb): to make a loud, deep angry cry | loc: üvölt
  EN TS: The tiger is roaring!
  hu TS: A tigris üvölt!
  EN FS: The lion is roaring!
  hu FS: Az oroszlán üvölt!
  EN TP: a roaring tiger
  hu TP: üvöltő tigris
  EN FP: a sleeping tiger
  hu FP: alvó tigris
2185 | pianist (noun): a person who plays the piano | loc: zongorista
  EN TS: The pianist has blonde hair.
  hu TS: A zongoristának szőke haja van.
  EN FS: The pianist has black hair.
  hu FS: A zongoristának fekete haja van.
  EN TP: a pianist at the piano
  hu TP: zongorista a zongoránál
  EN FP: a pianist at a keyboard
  hu FP: zongorista a szintetizátornál
2186 | thorn (noun): a sharp spike growing on a plant stem | loc: tövis
  EN TS: Jesus wears a crown of thorns.
  hu TS: Jézus töviskoronát visel.
  EN FS: Jesus wears a crown of gold.
  hu FS: Jézus aranykoronát visel.
  EN TP: a crown of thorns
  hu TP: töviskorona
  EN FP: a rose with thorns
  hu FP: tövises rózsa
2187 | buddha (noun): the founder of Buddhism, shown meditating | loc: Buddha
  EN TS: Buddha is meditating.
  hu TS: Buddha meditál.
  EN FS: Buddha is dancing.
  hu FS: Buddha táncol.
  EN TP: Buddha meditating
  hu TP: meditáló Buddha
  EN FP: Buddha lying down
  hu FP: fekvő Buddha
2188 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: sírni
  EN TS: The boy is crying, Mom isn't.
  hu TS: A fiú sír, anya nem.
  EN FS: The boy is singing, Mom isn't.
  hu FS: A fiú énekel, anya nem.
  EN TP: crying on a bike
  hu TP: sírás a biciklin
  EN FP: crying in bed
  hu FP: sírás az ágyban
2189 | fall overboard (phrase): to fall off a boat into the water | loc: vízbe esni a hajóról
  EN TS: Someone is falling overboard!
  hu TS: Valaki a vízbe esik a hajóról!
  EN FS: Someone is diving overboard!
  hu FS: Valaki fejest ugrik a hajóról!
  EN TP: falling overboard backwards
  hu TP: hanyatt esés a hajóról a vízbe
  EN FP: falling asleep in the boat
  hu FP: elalvás a csónakban
2190 | villain (noun): an evil character in a story or film | loc: gonosztevő
  EN TS: This villain has flaming eyes.
  hu TS: Ennek a gonosztevőnek lángoló szeme van.
  EN FS: This villain has blue eyes.
  hu FS: Ennek a gonosztevőnek kék szeme van.
  EN TP: a villain in burning ruins
  hu TP: gonosztevő égő romok között
  EN FP: a villain in a castle
  hu FP: gonosztevő egy kastélyban
2191 | android (noun): a robot built to look like a human | loc: android
  EN TS: The android has a human face.
  hu TS: Az androidnak emberi arca van.
  EN FS: The android has a long beard.
  hu FS: Az androidnak hosszú szakálla van.
  EN TP: a glowing female android
  hu TP: világító női android
  EN FP: an android in a kitchen
  hu FP: android a konyhában
2192 | flask (noun): a narrow-necked glass container for liquids | loc: lombik
  EN TS: Harry Potter would love these flasks.
  hu TS: Harry Potter imádná ezeket a lombikokat.
  EN FS: Harry Potter would love these brooms.
  hu FS: Harry Potter imádná ezeket a seprűket.
  EN TP: glowing glass flasks
  hu TP: világító üveglombikok
  EN FP: a thermos flask
  hu FP: termosz
2194 | tropical (adjective): from the hot wet regions near the equator | loc: trópusi
  EN TS: Tropical leaves are big. Wow.
  hu TS: A trópusi levelek nagyok. Hű.
  EN FS: Tropical leaves are tiny. Wow.
  hu FS: A trópusi levelek aprók. Hű.
  EN TP: dense tropical leaves
  hu TP: sűrű trópusi levelek
  EN FP: a tropical beach
  hu FP: trópusi strand
2195 | watercolor (noun): water-based paint, and pictures made with it | loc: akvarell
  EN TS: The watercolor is dripping.
  hu TS: Csöpög az akvarell.
  EN FS: The oil paint is dripping.
  hu FS: Csöpög az olajfesték.
  EN TP: a watercolor portrait
  hu TP: akvarell portré
  EN FP: a watercolor landscape
  hu FP: akvarell tájkép
2199 | delicate (adjective): fine, soft and easily damaged | loc: finom
  EN TS: Delicate roses everywhere!
  hu TS: Finom rózsák mindenhol!
  EN FS: Delicate tulips everywhere!
  hu FS: Finom tulipánok mindenhol!
  EN TP: delicate pink roses
  hu TP: finom rózsaszín rózsák
  EN FP: a delicate glass vase
  hu FP: finom üvegváza
2200 | elegant (adjective): graceful and stylish to look at | loc: elegáns
  EN TS: She looks elegant in her gown.
  hu TS: Elegáns az estélyijében.
  EN FS: She looks elegant in her coat.
  hu FS: Elegáns a kabátjában.
  EN TP: an elegant flowing gown
  hu TP: elegáns, omló estélyi
  EN FP: an elegant black suit
  hu FP: elegáns fekete öltöny
2201 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: narancssárga
  EN TS: Her orange armour is so cool!
  hu TS: Szuper a narancssárga páncélja!
  EN FS: Her pink armour is so cool!
  hu FS: Szuper a rózsaszín páncélja!
  EN TP: orange hair and armour
  hu TP: narancssárga haj és páncél
  EN FP: an orange in her hand
  hu FP: narancs a kezében
2202 | smart (adjective): neat and well-dressed, not scruffy | loc: elegáns
  EN TS: His white blazer looks smart.
  hu TS: Elegáns a fehér zakója.
  EN FS: His red blazer looks smart.
  hu FS: Elegáns a piros zakója.
  EN TP: a smart white blazer
  hu TP: elegáns fehér zakó
  EN FP: a smart dark suit
  hu FP: elegáns sötét öltöny
2204 | lamb (noun): a baby sheep | loc: bárány
  EN TS: He is holding a lamb.
  hu TS: Egy bárányt tart a kezében.
  EN FS: He is holding a dog.
  hu FS: Egy kutyát tart a kezében.
  EN TP: a lamb in his arms
  hu TP: bárány a karjában
  EN FP: a lamb in a field
  hu FP: bárány a mezőn
2207 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: mutatni
  EN TS: The robot hand is pointing.
  hu TS: A robotkéz mutat valamire.
  EN FS: The robot hand is waving.
  hu FS: A robotkéz integet valakinek.
  EN TP: pointing at a screen
  hu TP: a képernyőre mutat
  EN FP: pointing at the sky
  hu FP: az égre mutat
2208 | pink (adjective): a light shade of red | loc: rózsaszín
  EN TS: Her hair is bright pink.
  hu TS: A haja élénk rózsaszín.
  EN FS: Her hair is bright green.
  hu FS: A haja élénkzöld.
  EN TP: bright pink hair
  hu TP: élénk rózsaszín haj
  EN FP: a bright pink dress
  hu FP: élénk rózsaszín ruha
2211 | trident (noun): a spear with three sharp points | loc: háromágú szigony
  EN TS: Guess who has a trident? The sea god.
  hu TS: Kitalálod, kinél van háromágú szigony? A tenger istenénél.
  EN FS: Guess who has a hammer? The sea god.
  hu FS: Kitalálod, kinél van kalapács? A tenger istenénél.
  EN TP: a god with a trident
  hu TP: isten háromágú szigonnyal
  EN FP: a trident in the sand
  hu FP: háromágú szigony a homokban
2212 | stripes (noun): long thin lines of a different color | loc: csíkok
  EN TS: Nice stripes, tiger!
  hu TS: Szép csíkok, tigris!
  EN FS: Nice spots, tiger!
  hu FS: Szép pöttyök, tigris!
  EN TP: a tiger with black stripes
  hu TP: tigris fekete csíkokkal
  EN FP: a zebra with black stripes
  hu FP: zebra fekete csíkokkal
2213 | ram (noun): a male sheep with big curved horns | loc: kos
  EN TS: Fact: rams have curly horns.
  hu TS: Tény: a kosoknak csavart szarvuk van.
  EN FS: Fact: rams have flat horns.
  hu FS: Tény: a kosoknak lapos szarvuk van.
  EN TP: a ram with curly horns
  hu TP: csavart szarvú kos
  EN FP: a ram eating grass
  hu FP: füvet legelő kos
2214 | through (preposition): from one side of an opening to the other | loc: keresztül
  EN TS: I can see a castle through it.
  hu TS: Rajta keresztül egy kastélyt látok.
  EN FS: I can see a church through it.
  hu FS: Rajta keresztül egy templomot látok.
  EN TP: looking through a rock hole
  hu TP: kilátás egy sziklalyukon keresztül
  EN FP: looking through a window
  hu FP: kilátás egy ablakon keresztül
2216 | altar (noun): a raised table where people pray | loc: oltár
  EN TS: She is praying at an altar.
  hu TS: Egy oltárnál imádkozik.
  EN FS: She is singing at an altar.
  hu FS: Egy oltárnál énekel.
  EN TP: praying at a candlelit altar
  hu TP: imádkozás gyertyás oltárnál
  EN FP: getting married at the altar
  hu FP: esküvő az oltárnál
2217 | spell (noun): words or power used to make magic happen | loc: varázslat | translator note: FP "spell of bad weather" pun does not travel; swapped for a similar magic label
  EN TS: She's casting a spell. Cool.
  hu TS: Varázslatot szór. Menő.
  EN FS: She's casting a net. Cool.
  hu FS: Hálót vet. Menő.
  EN TP: casting a magic spell
  hu TP: varázslatot szór
  EN FP: a spell of bad weather
  hu FP: varázskönyvet olvas
2218 | circuit (noun): the path electricity follows on a board | loc: áramkör
  EN TS: Circuits are all around him.
  hu TS: Áramkörök vannak körülötte.
  EN FS: Flowers are all around him.
  hu FS: Virágok vannak körülötte.
  EN TP: glowing circuit lines
  hu TP: világító áramköri vonalak
  EN FP: a race circuit
  hu FP: autóversenypálya
2220 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: számolni
  EN TS: He is counting the money carefully.
  hu TS: Gondosan számolja a pénzt.
  EN FS: He is counting the coins carefully.
  hu FS: Gondosan számolja az érméket.
  EN TP: counting a stack of bills
  hu TP: bankjegyköteget számol
  EN FP: counting down the seconds
  hu FP: visszaszámol a másodpercekből
2224 | hold hands (phrase): to walk or stand with your fingers joined | loc: kézen fogva menni
  EN TS: They are holding hands.
  hu TS: Kézen fogva mennek.
  EN FS: They are shaking hands.
  hu FS: Kezet fognak.
  EN TP: holding hands in the rain
  hu TP: kézen fogva az esőben
  EN FP: holding hands in the sun
  hu FP: kézen fogva a napsütésben
2225 | soaked (adjective): completely wet, right through | loc: bőrig ázott
  EN TS: Poor girl, her hair is soaked.
  hu TS: Szegény lány bőrig ázott, a haja csurom víz.
  EN FS: Poor girl, her hair is dry.
  hu FS: Szegény lány, a haja teljesen száraz.
  EN TP: soaked in heavy rain
  hu TP: bőrig ázva a zuhogó esőben
  EN FP: soaked in hot water
  hu FP: ázás forró vízben
2226 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: karkötő
  EN TS: He has golden bracelets.
  hu TS: Arany karkötői vannak.
  EN FS: He has golden gloves.
  hu FS: Arany kesztyűi vannak.
  EN TP: golden bracelets on wrists
  hu TP: arany karkötők a csuklóján
  EN FP: a bracelet in a shop
  hu FP: karkötő egy boltban
2227 | glance (verb): to look at something quickly | loc: pillant
  EN TS: She is glancing back. At you?
  hu TS: Hátrapillant. Rád?
  EN FS: She is glancing down. At you?
  hu FS: Lepillant. Rád?
  EN TP: glancing over her shoulder
  hu TP: hátrapillant a válla fölött
  EN FP: glancing at her phone
  hu FP: a telefonjára pillant
2228 | above (preposition): higher than something, over it | loc: fölött
  EN TS: She is sitting above the city.
  hu TS: A város fölött ül.
  EN FS: She is sitting above the sea.
  hu FS: A tenger fölött ül.
  EN TP: high above the city
  hu TP: magasan a város fölött
  EN FP: above the clouds
  hu FP: a felhők fölött
2231 | sphinx (noun): an Egyptian statue: human head, lion body | loc: szfinx
  EN TS: A giant golden sphinx.
  hu TS: Óriási arany szfinx.
  EN FS: A giant silver sphinx.
  hu FS: Óriási ezüst szfinx.
  EN TP: a golden sphinx statue
  hu TP: arany szfinxszobor
  EN FP: a sphinx cat sleeping
  hu FP: alvó szfinx macska
2232 | peaceful (adjective): not disturbed by fighting or trouble | loc: békés
  EN TS: The Buddha looks peaceful.
  hu TS: Buddha békésnek tűnik.
  EN FS: The Buddha looks angry.
  hu FS: Buddha dühösnek tűnik.
  EN TP: a peaceful golden Buddha
  hu TP: békés arany Buddha
  EN FP: a peaceful golden temple
  hu FP: békés arany templom
2233 | baseball (noun): a game where you hit a ball with a bat and run | loc: baseball
  EN TS: She has two baseball gloves.
  hu TS: Két baseballkesztyű van nála.
  EN FS: She has two baseball bats.
  hu FS: Két baseballütő van nála.
  EN TP: baseball gloves in both hands
  hu TP: baseballkesztyű mindkét kézben
  EN FP: baseball on television
  hu FP: baseball a tévében
2234 | muscles (noun): the strong parts that move your body | loc: izmok
  EN TS: The warrior has big muscles.
  hu TS: A harcosnak nagy izmai vannak.
  EN FS: The warrior has a big shield.
  hu FS: A harcosnak nagy pajzsa van.
  EN TP: a warrior's big muscles
  hu TP: a harcos nagy izmai
  EN FP: a warrior's big shield
  hu FP: a harcos nagy pajzsa
2235 | profile (noun): the side view of a person's face | loc: profil
  EN TS: He is shown in full profile.
  hu TS: Teljes profilból látjuk.
  EN FS: He is shown from the back.
  hu FS: Hátulról látjuk.
  EN TP: a man in full profile
  hu TP: férfi teljes profilból
  EN FP: a profile picture online
  hu FP: profilkép online
2236 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: palota
  EN TS: Palace under a huge moon. Wow!
  hu TS: Palota egy óriási hold alatt. Hű!
  EN FS: Palace under a huge sun. Wow!
  hu FS: Palota egy óriási nap alatt. Hű!
  EN TP: a palace in the mountains
  hu TP: palota a hegyekben
  EN FP: a palace in the desert
  hu FP: palota a sivatagban
2237 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: fényes
  EN TS: Look at this shiny yellow car!
  hu TS: Nézd ezt a fényes sárga autót!
  EN FS: Look at this shiny red car!
  hu FS: Nézd ezt a fényes piros autót!
  EN TP: a shiny yellow car
  hu TP: fényes sárga autó
  EN FP: a shiny yellow bus
  hu FP: fényes sárga busz
2238 | mosque (noun): a building where Muslims go to pray | loc: mecset
  EN TS: The mosque has many domes.
  hu TS: A mecsetnek sok kupolája van.
  EN FS: The mosque has one dome.
  hu FS: A mecsetnek egy kupolája van.
  EN TP: a grand mosque with domes
  hu TP: kupolás nagymecset
  EN FP: a mosque in the desert
  hu FP: mecset a sivatagban
2242 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: madárraj
  EN TS: The flock has zero free seats.
  hu TS: A madárrajban nulla szabad hely van.
  EN FS: The flock has many free seats.
  hu FS: A madárrajban rengeteg szabad hely van.
  EN TP: a flock of small birds
  hu TP: apró madarak raja
  EN FP: a flock of sheep
  hu FP: birkanyáj
2245 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: benőtt
  EN TS: It's just a bit overgrown.
  hu TS: Csak egy kicsit benőtt.
  EN FS: It's just a bit snowy.
  hu FS: Csak egy kicsit havas.
  EN TP: an overgrown cottage
  hu TP: benőtt házikó
  EN FP: an overgrown lawn
  hu FP: benőtt gyep
2246 | miniature (adjective): a very small copy of something bigger | loc: miniatűr
  EN TS: The display features a miniature cottage.
  hu TS: A kiállításon egy miniatűr házikó látható.
  EN FS: The display features a miniature castle.
  hu FS: A kiállításon egy miniatűr kastély látható.
  EN TP: a miniature night garden
  hu TP: miniatűr éjszakai kert
  EN FP: a miniature train set
  hu FP: miniatűr vasútmodell
2247 | scotland (noun): a country in the north of Great Britain | loc: Skócia
  EN TS: Scotland has a lonely church.
  hu TS: Skóciában van egy magányos templom.
  EN FS: Scotland has a lonely castle.
  hu FS: Skóciában van egy magányos kastély.
  EN TP: a church in Scotland
  hu TP: templom Skóciában
  EN FP: a castle in Scotland
  hu FP: kastély Skóciában
2248 | graceful (adjective): moving in a smooth, beautiful, elegant way | loc: kecses
  EN TS: She is floating gracefully.
  hu TS: Kecsesen lebeg.
  EN FS: She is dancing gracefully.
  hu FS: Kecsesen táncol.
  EN TP: floating gracefully in the air
  hu TP: kecses lebegés a levegőben
  EN FP: a graceful dance on stage
  hu FP: kecses tánc a színpadon
2249 | steampunk (adjective): a fantasy style of old brass machines and gears | loc: steampunk
  EN TS: A steampunk city of gears.
  hu TS: Fogaskerekekből épült steampunk város.
  EN FS: A steampunk city of glass.
  hu FS: Üvegből épült steampunk város.
  EN TP: brass steampunk towers
  hu TP: réz steampunk tornyok
  EN FP: a steampunk costume party
  hu FP: steampunk jelmezbuli
2250 | gaze (verb): to look at something steadily for a long time | loc: bámul
  EN TS: She is gazing at the city.
  hu TS: A várost bámulja.
  EN FS: She is gazing at the sea.
  hu FS: A tengert bámulja.
  EN TP: gazing at a rainy city
  hu TP: esős várost bámul
  EN FP: gazing at a starry sky
  hu FP: csillagos eget bámul
2251 | robe (noun): a long loose piece of clothing | loc: köntös
  EN TS: Heaven's dress code: a white robe.
  hu TS: A mennyei dress code: fehér köntös.
  EN FS: Heaven's dress code: a black robe.
  hu FS: A mennyei dress code: fekete köntös.
  EN TP: a long white robe
  hu TP: hosszú fehér köntös
  EN FP: a robe with a hood
  hu FP: kapucnis köntös
2254 | frozen (adjective): turned to ice or completely covered in ice | loc: fagyott
  EN TS: A frozen palace. Hi, Elsa!
  hu TS: Fagyott palota. Szia, Elza!
  EN FS: A frozen lake. Hi, Elsa!
  hu FS: Fagyott tó. Szia, Elza!
  EN TP: a frozen snowy palace
  hu TP: fagyott, havas palota
  EN FP: frozen peas in a bag
  hu FP: fagyott borsó zacskóban
2256 | mechanical (adjective): made of machine parts and worked by machine | loc: mechanikus
  EN TS: Her legs are fully mechanical.
  hu TS: A lábai teljesen mechanikusak.
  EN FS: Her legs are fully wooden.
  hu FS: A lábai teljesen fából vannak.
  EN TP: mechanical arms and legs
  hu TP: mechanikus karok és lábak
  EN FP: a mechanical watch
  hu FP: mechanikus karóra
2257 | eyebrows (noun): the lines of hair above your eyes | loc: szemöldök
  EN TS: Her eyebrows are very dark.
  hu TS: A szemöldöke nagyon sötét.
  EN FS: Her eyebrows are very light.
  hu FS: A szemöldöke nagyon világos.
  EN TP: thick dark eyebrows
  hu TP: sűrű, sötét szemöldök
  EN FP: thin blond eyebrows
  hu FP: vékony, szőke szemöldök
2258 | spire (noun): a tall thin pointed top on a tower | loc: toronysisak
  EN TS: The church has a tall spire.
  hu TS: A templomnak magas toronysisakja van.
  EN FS: The church has a round dome.
  hu FS: A templomnak kerek kupolája van.
  EN TP: a tall church spire
  hu TP: magas templomi toronysisak
  EN FP: a spire on a castle
  hu FP: toronysisak egy váron
2259 | lagoon (noun): a calm pool of sea water behind rocks | loc: lagúna
  EN TS: Take me to this lagoon now!
  hu TS: Vigyél el ehhez a lagúnához most!
  EN FS: Take me to this glacier now!
  hu FS: Vigyél el ehhez a gleccserhez most!
  EN TP: a turquoise lagoon with palms
  hu TP: türkiz lagúna pálmákkal
  EN FP: a frozen lagoon in winter
  hu FP: befagyott lagúna télen
2260 | rowboat (noun): a small open boat moved with oars | loc: evezős csónak
  EN TS: Poor rowboat, nobody wants it.
  hu TS: Szegény evezős csónak, senki sem akarja.
  EN FS: Poor ship, nobody wants it.
  hu FS: Szegény hajó, senki sem akarja.
  EN TP: an empty wooden rowboat
  hu TP: üres fa evezős csónak
  EN FP: a rowboat full of people
  hu FP: emberekkel teli evezős csónak
2262 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: összekapcsolni
  EN TS: Dots and lines connect them.
  hu TS: Pontok és vonalak kapcsolják össze őket.
  EN FS: Dots and lines divide them.
  hu FS: Pontok és vonalak választják el őket.
  EN TP: lines connecting two people
  hu TP: két embert összekapcsoló vonalak
  EN FP: a cable connecting a phone
  hu FP: telefont összekapcsoló kábel
2268 | tightrope (noun): a rope stretched high for acrobats to cross | loc: kifeszített kötél
  EN TS: She is on a tightrope. No net!
  hu TS: Kifeszített kötélen áll. Háló nélkül!
  EN FS: She is on a ladder. No net!
  hu FS: Létrán áll. Háló nélkül!
  EN TP: balancing on a tightrope
  hu TP: egyensúlyozás kifeszített kötélen
  EN FP: a circus tightrope act
  hu FP: cirkuszi kötéltánc-szám
2269 | blouse (noun): a loose light shirt worn by women | loc: blúz
  EN TS: Her blouse is loose and white.
  hu TS: A blúza bő és fehér.
  EN FS: Her dress is loose and white.
  hu FS: A ruhája bő és fehér.
  EN TP: a loose white blouse
  hu TP: bő fehér blúz
  EN FP: a tight black blouse
  hu FP: szűk fekete blúz
2271 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: folyosó
  EN TS: She is chilling in a corridor.
  hu TS: Egy folyosón chillel.
  EN FS: She is chilling in a kitchen.
  hu FS: Egy konyhában chillel.
  EN TP: a spaceship corridor
  hu TP: űrhajófolyosó
  EN FP: a hospital corridor
  hu FP: kórházi folyosó
2273 | jeans (noun): trousers made of strong blue cotton | loc: farmer
  EN TS: Ripped jeans, full denim look.
  hu TS: Szakadt farmer, full farmeres szett.
  EN FS: Ripped jeans, full black look.
  hu FS: Szakadt farmer, full fekete szett.
  EN TP: heavily ripped blue jeans
  hu TP: erősen szaggatott kék farmer
  EN FP: ironing blue jeans
  hu FP: kék farmer vasalása
2274 | lace (noun): fine cloth with open patterns of threads | loc: csipke
  EN TS: That lace collar is so fancy!
  hu TS: Az a csipkegallér nagyon puccos!
  EN FS: That fur collar is so fancy!
  hu FS: Az a szőrmegallér nagyon puccos!
  EN TP: an ornate lace collar
  hu TP: díszes csipkegallér
  EN FP: tying a shoe lace
  hu FP: cipőfűző megkötése
2275 | outfit (noun): the set of clothes worn together | loc: szett
  EN TS: Nice outfit, big sneakers!
  hu TS: Jó szett, nagy sneakerek!
  EN FS: Nice outfit, tiny sneakers!
  hu FS: Jó szett, apró sneakerek!
  EN TP: a street style outfit
  hu TP: utcai stílusú szett
  EN FP: an outfit for a wedding
  hu FP: szett egy esküvőre
2278 | look up (phrase): to raise your eyes to see something above | loc: felnézni | translator note: FP "look up a word" pun does not travel; kept the meaning
  EN TS: He is looking up at the sky.
  hu TS: Felnéz az égre.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  hu FS: Felnéz egy repülőre.
  EN TP: to look up at clouds
  hu TP: felnézni a felhőkre
  EN FP: to look up a word
  hu FP: kikeresni egy szót
2280 | embrace (verb): to put your arms around someone | loc: átölelni
  EN TS: He is embracing her at sunset.
  hu TS: Átöleli őt naplementekor.
  EN FS: He is embracing her in a car.
  hu FS: Átöleli őt egy autóban.
  EN TP: embracing on a sailing boat
  hu TP: átölelik egymást egy vitorláson
  EN FP: embracing a new idea
  hu FP: átölelni egy új ötletet
2282 | sailing (noun): the sport of travelling on a boat with wind power | loc: vitorlázás
  EN TS: Sailing at sunset. So chill.
  hu TS: Vitorlázás naplementekor. Nagyon chill.
  EN FS: Surfing at sunset. So chill.
  hu FS: Szörfözés naplementekor. Nagyon chill.
  EN TP: sailing at sunset
  hu TP: vitorlázás naplementekor
  EN FP: sailing in a storm
  hu FP: vitorlázás viharban
2284 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: frizura
  EN TS: Feathers? Bold hairstyle.
  hu TS: Tollak? Merész frizura.
  EN FS: Pearls? Bold hairstyle.
  hu FS: Gyöngyök? Merész frizura.
  EN TP: a hairstyle of feathers
  hu TP: tollakból álló frizura
  EN FP: a short hairstyle
  hu FP: rövid frizura
2285 | sweatshirt (noun): a warm soft long-sleeved top, often oversized | loc: pulcsi
  EN TS: Her sweatshirt is huge.
  hu TS: A pulcsija óriási.
  EN FS: Her backpack is huge.
  hu FS: A hátizsákja óriási.
  EN TP: a big blue sweatshirt
  hu TP: nagy kék pulcsi
  EN FP: a sweatshirt on a chair
  hu FP: pulcsi egy széken
2287 | grief (noun): deep sadness, especially after losing someone | loc: gyász
  EN TS: He is sitting alone in grief.
  hu TS: Egyedül ül a gyászában.
  EN FS: He is sitting alone in a car.
  hu FS: Egyedül ül egy autóban.
  EN TP: grief in a dark garden
  hu TP: gyász egy sötét kertben
  EN FP: grief at a funeral
  hu FP: gyász egy temetésen
2288 | crop top (noun): a short top that leaves the stomach bare | loc: crop top
  EN TS: Crop top at the marina.
  hu TS: Crop top a kikötőben.
  EN FS: Crop top at the ski resort.
  hu FS: Crop top a síparadicsomban.
  EN TP: a black crop top
  hu TP: fekete crop top
  EN FP: a white crop top
  hu FP: fehér crop top
2291 | asteroid (noun): a rock that flies through space | loc: aszteroida
  EN TS: Just a few asteroids. Relax.
  hu TS: Csak néhány aszteroida. Nyugi.
  EN FS: Just a few birds. Relax.
  hu FS: Csak néhány madár. Nyugi.
  EN TP: floating asteroids
  hu TP: lebegő aszteroidák
  EN FP: an asteroid hitting Earth
  hu FP: Földbe csapódó aszteroida
2295 | sleeve (noun): the part of a garment that covers the arm | loc: ruhaujj
  EN TS: Those sleeves are enormous!
  hu TS: Ezek a ruhaujjak hatalmasak!
  EN FS: Those boots are enormous!
  hu FS: Ezek a csizmák hatalmasak!
  EN TP: wide white sleeves
  hu TP: bő fehér ruhaujjak
  EN FP: short black sleeves
  hu FP: rövid fekete ruhaujjak
2296 | floral (adjective): decorated with a flower pattern | loc: virágmintás
  EN TS: Her floral dress matches the wall!
  hu TS: A virágmintás ruhája passzol a falhoz!
  EN FS: Her striped dress matches the wall!
  hu FS: A csíkos ruhája passzol a falhoz!
  EN TP: an orange floral dress
  hu TP: narancssárga virágmintás ruha
  EN FP: a floral beach shirt
  hu FP: virágmintás stranding
2297 | shore (noun): the land along the edge of the sea or a lake | loc: part
  EN TS: Waves are hitting the shore.
  hu TS: A hullámok a partot csapkodják.
  EN FS: Waves are hitting the boat.
  hu FS: A hullámok a hajót csapkodják.
  EN TP: palm trees on the shore
  hu TP: pálmafák a parton
  EN FP: a boat on the shore
  hu FP: csónak a parton
2300 | on fire (phrase): burning with flames | loc: lángokban
  EN TS: The guitar is on fire!
  hu TS: Lángokban áll a gitár!
  EN FS: The piano is on fire!
  hu FS: Lángokban áll a zongora!
  EN TP: a guitar on fire
  hu TP: lángokban álló gitár
  EN FP: a house on fire
  hu FP: lángokban álló ház
2301 | launch (verb): to send a rocket up into space | loc: fellőni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The shuttle is being launched.
  hu TS: Fellövik az űrsiklót.
  EN FS: The plane is being launched.
  hu FS: Fellövik a repülőgépet.
  EN TP: launching a space shuttle
  hu TP: űrsikló fellövése
  EN FP: launching a new product
  hu FP: új termék bevezetése
2302 | weightless (adjective): floating freely because gravity does not pull | loc: súlytalan
  EN TS: He is weightless and relaxed.
  hu TS: Súlytalan és nyugodt.
  EN FS: He is weightless and scared.
  hu FS: Súlytalan és rémült.
  EN TP: a weightless astronaut
  hu TP: súlytalan űrhajós
  EN FP: a weightless feather
  hu FP: súlytalan toll
2305 | rocky (adjective): covered with rocks and stones | loc: sziklás
  EN TS: A rocky road to a lighthouse.
  hu TS: Sziklás út egy világítótoronyhoz.
  EN FS: A rocky road to a castle.
  hu FS: Sziklás út egy kastélyhoz.
  EN TP: a rocky headland
  hu TP: sziklás földnyelv
  EN FP: a rocky beach with sunbeds
  hu FP: sziklás strand napágyakkal
2306 | countryside (noun): land with fields and villages, away from towns | loc: vidék
  EN TS: The countryside never ends.
  hu TS: A vidék sosem ér véget.
  EN FS: The city never ends.
  hu FS: A város sosem ér véget.
  EN TP: kids in the countryside
  hu TP: gyerekek vidéken
  EN FP: kids leaving the countryside
  hu FP: vidékről elköltöző gyerekek
2308 | viking (noun): a warrior sailor from old Scandinavia | loc: viking
  EN TS: The viking is holding a blade.
  hu TS: A viking pengét tart.
  EN FS: The viking is holding an axe.
  hu FS: A viking baltát tart.
  EN TP: a viking in fur
  hu TP: viking bundában
  EN FP: a viking on a ship
  hu FP: viking egy hajón
2310 | melody (noun): a line of musical notes that makes a tune | loc: dallam
  EN TS: A melody rises from the piano.
  hu TS: Dallam száll a zongorából.
  EN FS: A melody rises from the drum.
  hu FS: Dallam száll a dobból.
  EN TP: a golden melody rising
  hu TP: felszálló arany dallam
  EN FP: a golden melody falling
  hu FP: aláhulló arany dallam
2311 | stained glass (noun): coloured glass pieces forming a picture | loc: ólomüveg
  EN TS: The stained glass is huge.
  hu TS: Az ólomüveg hatalmas.
  EN FS: The stained glass is tiny.
  hu FS: Az ólomüveg apró.
  EN TP: tall stained glass windows
  hu TP: magas ólomüveg ablakok
  EN FP: a stained glass lamp
  hu FP: ólomüveg lámpa
2312 | race car (noun): a very fast car built for racing on a track | loc: versenyautó
  EN TS: A race car by the palm trees.
  hu TS: Versenyautó a pálmafák mellett.
  EN FS: A race car by the pine trees.
  hu FS: Versenyautó a fenyőfák mellett.
  EN TP: a red race car
  hu TP: piros versenyautó
  EN FP: a red race horse
  hu FP: piros versenyló
2313 | camper van (noun): a van you can travel and sleep in | loc: lakóautó
  EN TS: Home is where the camper van is.
  hu TS: Ott az otthon, ahol a lakóautó.
  EN FS: Home is where the orange tent is.
  hu FS: Ott az otthon, ahol a narancssárga sátor.
  EN TP: an orange camper van
  hu TP: narancssárga lakóautó
  EN FP: a camper van in town
  hu FP: lakóautó a városban
2314 | ghost (noun): the spirit of a dead person | loc: szellem
  EN TS: The ghost's costume: one old sheet.
  hu TS: A szellem jelmeze: egy régi lepedő.
  EN FS: The ghost's costume: one old towel.
  hu FS: A szellem jelmeze: egy régi törölköző.
  EN TP: a white sheet ghost
  hu TP: fehér lepedős szellem
  EN FP: a ghost in a castle
  hu FP: szellem egy kastélyban
2315 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: tájkép
  EN TS: This landscape is paper!
  hu TS: Ez a tájkép papírból van!
  EN FS: This landscape is glass!
  hu FS: Ez a tájkép üvegből van!
  EN TP: a paper landscape
  hu TP: papír tájkép
  EN FP: a landscape photo
  hu FP: tájképfotó
2317 | hood (noun): the part of a coat that covers your head | loc: csuklya
  EN TS: Her red hood is up.
  hu TS: Fel van húzva a piros csuklyája.
  EN FS: Her red hood is down.
  hu FS: Le van hajtva a piros csuklyája.
  EN TP: a red hood pulled up
  hu TP: felhúzott piros csuklya
  EN FP: the hood of a car
  hu FP: egy autó motorháztetője
2318 | sword (noun): a long metal blade with a handle for fighting | loc: kard
  EN TS: She has a very long sword.
  hu TS: Nagyon hosszú kardja van.
  EN FS: She has a very long spear.
  hu FS: Nagyon hosszú lándzsája van.
  EN TP: a long curved sword
  hu TP: hosszú, ívelt kard
  EN FP: a long straight sword
  hu FP: hosszú, egyenes kard
2322 | broken (adjective): cracked or in pieces, no longer whole | loc: törött
  EN TS: The glass is broken!
  hu TS: Az üveg törött!
  EN FS: The clock is broken!
  hu FS: Az óra törött!
  EN TP: a broken mirror portrait
  hu TP: törött tükrös portré
  EN FP: a broken arm in plaster
  hu FP: begipszelt törött kar
2324 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: énekelni
  EN TS: He is singing like a star!
  hu TS: Úgy énekel, mint egy sztár!
  EN FS: He is dancing like a star!
  hu FS: Úgy táncol, mint egy sztár!
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  hu TP: énekel a mikrofonba
  EN FP: singing in the shower
  hu FP: énekel a zuhany alatt
2326 | prince (noun): the son of a king or queen | loc: herceg
  EN TS: The prince has cool blue hair.
  hu TS: A hercegnek menő kék haja van.
  EN FS: The prince has cool pink hair.
  hu FS: A hercegnek menő rózsaszín haja van.
  EN TP: a prince with a crown
  hu TP: herceg koronával
  EN FP: a prince on a horse
  hu FP: herceg lóháton
2327 | palm tree (noun): a tall tree with no branches and big top leaves | loc: pálmafa
  EN TS: This car and the palm trees look so cool.
  hu TS: Ez az autó és a pálmafák nagyon menők.
  EN FS: This bike and the palm trees look so cool.
  hu FS: Ez a bicikli és a pálmafák nagyon menők.
  EN TP: palm trees at sunset
  hu TP: pálmafák naplementekor
  EN FP: palm trees on an island
  hu FP: pálmafák egy szigeten
2328 | throne (noun): the decorated chair of a king or queen | loc: trónus
  EN TS: Such a "humble" throne!
  hu TS: Micsoda „szerény” trónus!
  EN FS: Such a "humble" bed!
  hu FS: Micsoda „szerény” ágy!
  EN TP: a huge golden throne
  hu TP: hatalmas arany trónus
  EN FP: an empty golden throne
  hu FP: üres arany trónus
2330 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: adni
  EN TS: She wants to give you flowers.
  hu TS: Virágot akar adni neked.
  EN FS: She wants to give you a cake.
  hu FS: Tortát akar adni neked.
  EN TP: giving three yellow flowers
  hu TP: három sárga virágot ad
  EN FP: giving red roses
  hu FP: vörös rózsákat ad
2333 | in love (phrase): having strong romantic feelings for someone | loc: szerelmes
  EN TS: They are so in love!
  hu TS: Nagyon szerelmesek!
  EN FS: They are so angry!
  hu FS: Nagyon dühösek!
  EN TP: in love under autumn leaves
  hu TP: szerelmesek az őszi levelek alatt
  EN FP: in love on a beach
  hu FP: szerelmesek a tengerparton
2340 | strange (adjective): unusual and hard to understand | loc: furcsa
  EN TS: This house is a bit strange.
  hu TS: Ez a ház kicsit furcsa.
  EN FS: This car is a bit strange.
  hu FS: Ez az autó kicsit furcsa.
  EN TP: a strange tall house
  hu TP: furcsa magas ház
  EN FP: a strange old boat
  hu FP: furcsa öreg csónak
2341 | death (noun): the end of a living thing's life | loc: halál
  EN TS: Flowers make death look pretty.
  hu TS: A virágoktól még a halál is szép.
  EN FS: Candles make death look pretty.
  hu FS: A gyertyáktól még a halál is szép.
  EN TP: death among flowers
  hu TP: halál virágok között
  EN FP: death in a car crash
  hu FP: halál autóbalesetben
2344 | crooked (adjective): bent and leaning, not straight | loc: görbe
  EN TS: The houses are a bit crooked.
  hu TS: A házak kicsit görbék.
  EN FS: The trees are a bit crooked.
  hu FS: A fák kicsit görbék.
  EN TP: tall crooked houses
  hu TP: magas görbe házak
  EN FP: a crooked picture frame
  hu FP: görbe képkeret
2345 | wizard (noun): a man in stories who can do magic | loc: varázsló
  EN TS: What a long wizard beard!
  hu TS: Micsoda hosszú varázslószakáll!
  EN FS: What a short wizard beard!
  hu FS: Micsoda rövid varázslószakáll!
  EN TP: an old wizard in grey
  hu TP: idős varázsló szürkében
  EN FP: an old wizard in red
  hu FP: idős varázsló pirosban
2347 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: felfedezni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is exploring an exoplanet.
  hu TS: Egy exobolygót fedez fel.
  EN FS: He is exploring a deep cave.
  hu FS: Egy mély barlangot fedez fel.
  EN TP: exploring an alien world
  hu TP: idegen világ felfedezése
  EN FP: exploring an old castle
  hu FP: régi kastély felfedezése
2349 | dress up (phrase): to put on a costume to look like someone else | loc: beöltözni
  EN TS: Even the cat dressed up!
  hu TS: Még a macska is beöltözött!
  EN FS: Even the dog dressed up!
  hu FS: Még a kutya is beöltözött!
  EN TP: dressed up as witches
  hu TP: boszorkánynak beöltözve
  EN FP: dressed up as pirates
  hu FP: kalóznak beöltözve
2350 | carve (verb): to cut a shape into something hard | loc: farag
  EN TS: Somebody carved faces! Wow!
  hu TS: Valaki arcokat faragott! Hű!
  EN FS: Somebody carved names! Wow!
  hu FS: Valaki neveket faragott! Hű!
  EN TP: carved pumpkin faces
  hu TP: faragott tökarcok
  EN FP: carved wooden faces
  hu FP: faragott faarcok
2351 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: vezetni
  EN TS: Someone is driving a green car.
  hu TS: Valaki egy zöld autót vezet.
  EN FS: Someone is driving a yellow car.
  hu FS: Valaki egy sárga autót vezet.
  EN TP: to drive through autumn
  hu TP: vezetni az őszön át
  EN FP: to drive through the snow
  hu FP: vezetni a hóban
2353 | giant (adjective): far bigger than normal for its kind | loc: óriási
  EN TS: The mushrooms are giant, bro.
  hu TS: A gombák óriásiak, tesó.
  EN FS: The mushrooms are tiny, bro.
  hu FS: A gombák aprók, tesó.
  EN TP: giant pink mushrooms
  hu TP: óriási rózsaszín gombák
  EN FP: giant pink flowers
  hu FP: óriási rózsaszín virágok
2354 | headdress (noun): a decorated head covering for ceremonies | loc: fejdísz
  EN TS: A huge golden headdress!
  hu TS: Hatalmas arany fejdísz!
  EN FS: A huge silver headdress!
  hu FS: Hatalmas ezüst fejdísz!
  EN TP: a huge golden headdress
  hu TP: hatalmas arany fejdísz
  EN FP: taking off a headdress
  hu FP: fejdísz levétele
2356 | toward (preposition): in the direction of something | loc: felé
  EN TS: The road leads toward a planet.
  hu TS: Az út egy bolygó felé vezet.
  EN FS: The road leads toward a castle.
  hu FS: Az út egy kastély felé vezet.
  EN TP: toward a huge planet
  hu TP: egy óriási bolygó felé
  EN FP: toward a huge city
  hu FP: egy óriási város felé
2357 | black and white (phrase): with no colors, only dark and light shades | loc: fekete-fehér
  EN TS: The house is black and white.
  hu TS: A ház fekete-fehér.
  EN FS: The house is red and white.
  hu FS: A ház piros-fehér.
  EN TP: a black and white drawing
  hu TP: fekete-fehér rajz
  EN FP: a black and white film
  hu FP: fekete-fehér film
2358 | farm (noun): land where people grow food and keep animals | loc: farm
  EN TS: The farm has red roofs.
  hu TS: A farmon piros tetők vannak.
  EN FS: The farm has blue roofs.
  hu FS: A farmon kék tetők vannak.
  EN TP: a farm on a hillside
  hu TP: farm egy domboldalon
  EN FP: a farm with cows
  hu FP: farm tehenekkel
2359 | traditional (adjective): done or worn as it was long ago | loc: hagyományos
  EN TS: They wear traditional dress.
  hu TS: Hagyományos ruhát viselnek.
  EN FS: They wear modern dress.
  hu FS: Modern ruhát viselnek.
  EN TP: traditional Indian dress
  hu TP: hagyományos indiai viselet
  EN FP: a traditional wedding cake
  hu FP: hagyományos esküvői torta
2360 | fast (adjective): moving or able to move very quickly | loc: gyors
  EN TS: That red car looks crazy fast.
  hu TS: Az a piros autó őrült gyorsnak tűnik.
  EN FS: That red van looks crazy fast.
  hu FS: Az a piros furgon őrült gyorsnak tűnik.
  EN TP: a fast red car
  hu TP: gyors piros autó
  EN FP: a fast red boat
  hu FP: gyors piros hajó
2363 | mysterious (adjective): strange and hard to explain | loc: titokzatos
  EN TS: She's turning into mysterious smoke.
  hu TS: Titokzatos füstté változik.
  EN FS: She's turning into mysterious water.
  hu FS: Titokzatos vízzé változik.
  EN TP: a mysterious smoky woman
  hu TP: titokzatos, füstös nő
  EN FP: a mysterious locked door
  hu FP: titokzatos zárt ajtó
2364 | bull (noun): a large male animal of the cow family | loc: bika
  EN TS: A white bull is behind him.
  hu TS: Egy fehér bika áll mögötte.
  EN FS: A white horse is behind him.
  hu FS: Egy fehér ló áll mögötte.
  EN TP: a bull with curved horns
  hu TP: görbe szarvú bika
  EN FP: a bull in a ring
  hu FP: bika egy arénában
2365 | metal (noun): a hard shiny material like iron or steel | loc: fém
  EN TS: His metal suit is so shiny.
  hu TS: Olyan fényes a fémruhája.
  EN FS: His metal suit is so dirty.
  hu FS: Olyan koszos a fémruhája.
  EN TP: a red metal suit
  hu TP: piros fémruha
  EN FP: a red metal car
  hu FP: piros fém autó
2367 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: piszkos
  EN TS: This car is a little dirty.
  hu TS: Ez az autó egy kicsit piszkos.
  EN FS: This bus is a little dirty.
  hu FS: Ez a busz egy kicsit piszkos.
  EN TP: an old dirty sports car
  hu TP: régi, piszkos sportautó
  EN FP: a dirty old bus
  hu FP: piszkos öreg busz
2368 | paradise (noun): a perfect place where all is wonderful | loc: paradicsom
  EN TS: This beach is total paradise.
  hu TS: Ez a strand maga a paradicsom.
  EN FS: This desert is total paradise.
  hu FS: Ez a sivatag maga a paradicsom.
  EN TP: a tropical paradise at sunset
  hu TP: trópusi paradicsom naplementekor
  EN FP: a paradise for skiers
  hu FP: a síelők paradicsoma
2371 | sorrow (noun): deep sadness, especially about a loss | loc: bánat
  EN TS: The angel is lost in sorrow.
  hu TS: Az angyal elmerül a bánatában.
  EN FS: The angel is lost in a book.
  hu FS: Az angyal elmerül a könyvében.
  EN TP: an angel full of sorrow
  hu TP: bánattal teli angyal
  EN FP: an angel full of joy
  hu FP: örömmel teli angyal
2372 | exhausted (adjective): extremely tired with no energy left | loc: kimerült
  EN TS: He looks totally exhausted.
  hu TS: Teljesen kimerültnek tűnik.
  EN FS: He looks totally excited.
  hu FS: Teljesen izgatottnak tűnik.
  EN TP: an exhausted worker
  hu TP: kimerült munkás
  EN FP: an exhausted phone battery
  hu FP: lemerült telefonakku
2373 | universe (noun): all of space with its stars and planets | loc: világegyetem
  EN TS: The universe looks crowded.
  hu TS: A világegyetem zsúfoltnak tűnik.
  EN FS: The universe looks empty.
  hu FS: A világegyetem üresnek tűnik.
  EN TP: a universe full of planets
  hu TP: bolygókkal teli világegyetem
  EN FP: a universe without stars
  hu FP: csillagok nélküli világegyetem
2375 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: fél
  EN TS: Half grey, half yellow. It cannot decide.
  hu TS: Félig szürke, félig sárga. Nem tud dönteni.
  EN FS: Half grey, half green. It cannot decide.
  hu FS: Félig szürke, félig zöld. Nem tud dönteni.
  EN TP: half a yellow car
  hu TP: egy fél sárga autó
  EN FP: half a yellow bus
  hu FP: egy fél sárga busz
2378 | relax (verb): to calm down and let your body feel loose | loc: lazítani
  EN TS: She is totally relaxing now.
  hu TS: Most teljesen lazít.
  EN FS: She is totally running now.
  hu FS: Most épp rohan.
  EN TP: relaxing under the moon
  hu TP: lazítás a hold alatt
  EN FP: relaxing on the beach
  hu FP: lazítás a strandon
2379 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: esni
  EN TS: Red leaves are falling.
  hu TS: Piros levelek esnek.
  EN FS: Red apples are falling.
  hu FS: Piros almák esnek.
  EN TP: leaves falling in the rain
  hu TP: esőben hulló levelek
  EN FP: snow falling on cars
  hu FP: autókra hulló hó
2380 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: megszökni | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc "megszökni" means escape from captivity; used "menekül" for escaping danger
  EN TS: The car is escaping the fire!
  hu TS: Az autó menekül a tűz elől!
  EN FS: The car is escaping the flood!
  hu FS: Az autó menekül az árvíz elől!
  EN TP: escaping a burning forest
  hu TP: menekülés egy égő erdőből
  EN FP: escaping a burning house
  hu FP: menekülés egy égő házból
2381 | claws (noun): the sharp curved nails on an animal's feet | loc: karmok
  EN TS: Those claws are really sharp!
  hu TS: Ezek a karmok nagyon élesek!
  EN FS: Those teeth are really sharp!
  hu FS: Ezek a fogak nagyon élesek!
  EN TP: claws on a branch
  hu TP: karmok egy ágon
  EN FP: claws on a cat
  hu FP: karmok egy macskán
2382 | scales (noun): the hard shiny plates on a fish's skin | loc: pikkelyek
  EN TS: Look, her tail has blue scales.
  hu TS: Nézd, a farkán kék pikkelyek vannak.
  EN FS: Look, her tail has pink scales.
  hu FS: Nézd, a farkán rózsaszín pikkelyek vannak.
  EN TP: a tail with blue scales
  hu TP: kék pikkelyes farok
  EN FP: weighing on the scales
  hu FP: fürdőszobai mérleg
2383 | gem (noun): a beautiful precious stone used in jewellery | loc: drágakő
  EN TS: Fire and gems everywhere!
  hu TS: Tűz és drágakövek mindenhol!
  EN FS: Ice and gems everywhere!
  hu FS: Jég és drágakövek mindenhol!
  EN TP: sparkling colorful gems
  hu TP: csillogó színes drágakövek
  EN FP: gems in a dark cave
  hu FP: drágakövek egy sötét barlangban
2384 | kingdom (noun): a land that a king or queen rules | loc: királyság
  EN TS: A tiny kingdom on a hill.
  hu TS: Apró királyság egy dombon.
  EN FS: A tiny kingdom on an island.
  hu FS: Apró királyság egy szigeten.
  EN TP: a storybook kingdom
  hu TP: mesebeli királyság
  EN FP: the animal kingdom
  hu FP: az állatok királysága
2385 | alien (adjective): coming from another planet, not from Earth | loc: földönkívüli
  EN TS: A purple alien landscape.
  hu TS: Lila földönkívüli táj.
  EN FS: A green alien landscape.
  hu FS: Zöld földönkívüli táj.
  EN TP: a purple alien world
  hu TP: lila földönkívüli világ
  EN FP: an alien in a spaceship
  hu FP: földönkívüli egy űrhajóban
2386 | railing (noun): a fence of bars you hold onto | loc: korlát
  EN TS: The railing faces the sunset.
  hu TS: A korlát a naplemente felé néz.
  EN FS: The railing faces a mountain.
  hu FS: A korlát egy hegy felé néz.
  EN TP: a metal balcony railing
  hu TP: fém erkélykorlát
  EN FP: a railing on a staircase
  hu FP: lépcsőkorlát
2387 | twisted (adjective): bent and turned in many directions | loc: csavarodott
  EN TS: The tree is twisted. Cool.
  hu TS: A fa csavarodott. Menő.
  EN FS: The tree is straight. Cool.
  hu FS: A fa egyenes. Menő.
  EN TP: a twisted old tree
  hu TP: csavarodott öreg fa
  EN FP: a twisted metal fence
  hu FP: csavarodott fémkerítés
2388 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: gamer
  EN TS: This gamer loves pink.
  hu TS: Ez a gamer imádja a rózsaszínt.
  EN FS: This gamer loves green.
  hu FS: Ez a gamer imádja a zöldet.
  EN TP: a gamer in pink
  hu TP: gamer rózsaszínben
  EN FP: a gamer in blue
  hu FP: gamer kékben
2389 | faith (noun): a strong belief in God or a religion | loc: hit
  EN TS: She is praying with faith.
  hu TS: Hittel imádkozik.
  EN FS: She is praying with open arms.
  hu FS: Kitárt karokkal imádkozik.
  EN TP: praying with deep faith
  hu TP: imádkozás mély hittel
  EN FP: losing her faith
  hu FP: elveszíti a hitét
2390 | stylish (adjective): dressed in a fashionable, attractive way | loc: stílusos
  EN TS: So stylish on a beach!
  hu TS: Ilyen stílusos a tengerparton!
  EN FS: So stylish on a ship!
  hu FS: Ilyen stílusos egy hajón!
  EN TP: a stylish beach look
  hu TP: stílusos strandszett
  EN FP: a stylish winter coat
  hu FP: stílusos télikabát
2391 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: tájkép
  EN TS: Epic scenery, red sky.
  hu TS: Epikus tájkép, vörös ég.
  EN FS: Epic scenery, blue sky.
  hu FS: Epikus tájkép, kék ég.
  EN TP: scenery with a huge moon
  hu TP: tájkép hatalmas holddal
  EN FP: scenery for a school play
  hu FP: díszlet egy iskolai színdarabhoz
2392 | stroll (noun): a slow, relaxed walk for pleasure | loc: séta
  EN TS: A stroll in a straw hat? Stylish.
  hu TS: Séta szalmakalapban? Stílusos.
  EN FS: A stroll in a red hat? Stylish.
  hu FS: Séta piros kalapban? Stílusos.
  EN TP: a stroll among flowers
  hu TP: séta a virágok között
  EN FP: a stroll on the beach
  hu FP: séta a tengerparton
2393 | high heels (noun): shoes with a tall thin part under the back | loc: magas sarkú cipő
  EN TS: Office look with high heels.
  hu TS: Irodai szett magas sarkú cipővel.
  EN FS: Office look with trainers.
  hu FS: Irodai szett sportcipővel.
  EN TP: black strappy high heels
  hu TP: fekete pántos magas sarkú cipő
  EN FP: high heels in a box
  hu FP: magas sarkú cipő egy dobozban
2394 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: választani
  EN TS: He has to choose a road.
  hu TS: Választania kell egy utat.
  EN FS: He has to choose a boat.
  hu FS: Választania kell egy hajót.
  EN TP: choosing the right road
  hu TP: a jó út kiválasztása
  EN FP: choosing the right dress
  hu FP: a jó ruha kiválasztása
2395 | vest (noun): clothing without sleeves worn over a shirt | loc: mellény
  EN TS: His vest has gold buttons.
  hu TS: A mellényén aranygombok vannak.
  EN FS: His vest has silver buttons.
  hu FS: A mellényén ezüstgombok vannak.
  EN TP: a black leather vest
  hu TP: fekete bőrmellény
  EN FP: a vest under a jacket
  hu FP: mellény zakó alatt
2396 | corset (noun): a tight laced top that shapes the waist | loc: fűző
  EN TS: That laced corset is stunning.
  hu TS: Az a befűzött fűző lenyűgöző.
  EN FS: That laced glove is stunning.
  hu FS: Az a befűzött kesztyű lenyűgöző.
  EN TP: a laced corset
  hu TP: befűzött fűző
  EN FP: laced boots
  hu FP: befűzött csizma
2397 | gloomy (adjective): dark and sad, without light or cheer | loc: komor
  EN TS: This room is so gloomy!
  hu TS: Ez a szoba olyan komor!
  EN FS: This room is so sunny!
  hu FS: Ez a szoba olyan napos!
  EN TP: a gloomy gothic room
  hu TP: komor gótikus szoba
  EN FP: a gloomy rainy day
  hu FP: komor esős nap
2398 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: terasz
  EN TS: The terrace offers sea views.
  hu TS: A teraszról tengeri kilátás nyílik.
  EN FS: The terrace offers city views.
  hu FS: A teraszról városi kilátás nyílik.
  EN TP: a tiled seaside terrace
  hu TP: csempézett tengerparti terasz
  EN FP: a terrace in the mountains
  hu FP: terasz a hegyekben
2400 | fierce (adjective): violent, angry and frightening to look at | loc: vad
  EN TS: That's one fierce viking!
  hu TS: Ez aztán egy vad viking!
  EN FS: That's one fierce pirate!
  hu FS: Ez aztán egy vad kalóz!
  EN TP: a fierce angry stare
  hu TP: vad, dühös tekintet
  EN FP: a fierce storm at sea
  hu FP: vad vihar a tengeren
2401 | fantasy (noun): an imagined magical world, not real life | loc: fantáziavilág
  EN TS: A path into a fantasy world.
  hu TS: Ösvény egy fantáziavilágba.
  EN FS: A path into a busy city.
  hu FS: Ösvény egy nyüzsgő városba.
  EN TP: a fantasy forest path
  hu TP: fantáziavilági erdei ösvény
  EN FP: a fantasy book cover
  hu FP: fantasy könyvborító
2404 | lotus (noun): a large white water flower with many petals | loc: lótusz
  EN TS: This lotus has an orange centre.
  hu TS: Ennek a lótusznak narancssárga a közepe.
  EN FS: This lotus has a purple centre.
  hu FS: Ennek a lótusznak lila a közepe.
  EN TP: a white lotus flower
  hu TP: fehér lótuszvirág
  EN FP: a lotus yoga pose
  hu FP: lótuszülés jógában
2406 | jeep (noun): a strong car for driving on rough roads | loc: terepjáró
  EN TS: One jeep, too many bags!
  hu TS: Egy terepjáró, túl sok táska!
  EN FS: One bike, too many bags!
  hu FS: Egy bicikli, túl sok táska!
  EN TP: a jeep full of bags
  hu TP: táskákkal teli terepjáró
  EN FP: a jeep in the city
  hu FP: terepjáró a városban
2408 | imagination (noun): the mind's power to create unreal worlds | loc: képzelet
  EN TS: Imagination opens a real path.
  hu TS: A képzelet valódi ösvényt nyit.
  EN FS: Imagination opens a real door.
  hu FS: A képzelet valódi ajtót nyit.
  EN TP: a book of imagination
  hu TP: a képzelet könyve
  EN FP: no imagination at all
  hu FP: semmi képzelet
2411 | ornate (adjective): covered in rich, detailed patterns | loc: díszes
  EN TS: That crown is so ornate!
  hu TS: Az a korona nagyon díszes!
  EN FS: That mask is so ornate!
  hu FS: Az a maszk nagyon díszes!
  EN TP: an ornate golden crown
  hu TP: díszes aranykorona
  EN FP: an ornate wooden door
  hu FP: díszes faajtó
2412 | arm in arm (phrase): walking with your arm linked through another's | loc: karonfogva
  EN TS: They are walking arm in arm.
  hu TS: Karonfogva sétálnak.
  EN FS: They are running arm in arm.
  hu FS: Karonfogva futnak.
  EN TP: walking arm in arm
  hu TP: karonfogva sétálva
  EN FP: sitting arm in arm
  hu FP: karonfogva ülve
2413 | cub (noun): the baby of a wild animal like a wolf | loc: kölyök
  EN TS: She is hugging a wolf cub!
  hu TS: Egy farkaskölyköt ölel!
  EN FS: She is hugging a bear cub!
  hu FS: Egy medvekölyköt ölel!
  EN TP: hugging a wolf cub
  hu TP: farkaskölyök ölelése
  EN FP: hugging a big wolf
  hu FP: nagy farkas ölelése
2415 | garland (noun): a chain of flowers worn or hung as decoration | loc: virágfüzér
  EN TS: The god wears flower garlands.
  hu TS: Az isten virágfüzéreket visel.
  EN FS: The god wears paper garlands.
  hu FS: Az isten papírfüzéreket visel.
  EN TP: garlands of red flowers
  hu TP: vörös virágfüzérek
  EN FP: garlands on a Christmas tree
  hu FP: füzérek a karácsonyfán
2417 | harmony (noun): a state where opposites fit together calmly | loc: harmónia
  EN TS: Dark and light in harmony.
  hu TS: Sötét és világos harmóniában.
  EN FS: Red and blue in harmony.
  hu FS: Piros és kék harmóniában.
  EN TP: a sphere of harmony
  hu TP: a harmónia gömbje
  EN FP: singing in harmony
  hu FP: éneklés harmóniában
2418 | songbird (noun): a small bird known for its singing | loc: énekesmadár
  EN TS: I think it's a songbird.
  hu TS: Szerintem ez egy énekesmadár.
  EN FS: I think it's a pigeon.
  hu FS: Szerintem ez egy galamb.
  EN TP: a songbird on a branch
  hu TP: énekesmadár egy ágon
  EN FP: a songbird on a roof
  hu FP: énekesmadár egy háztetőn
2420 | rickety (adjective): old, weak and likely to fall apart | loc: rozoga
  EN TS: This rickety tower is "safe".
  hu TS: Ez a rozoga torony „biztonságos”.
  EN FS: This rickety bridge is "safe".
  hu FS: Ez a rozoga híd „biztonságos”.
  EN TP: a rickety tower of houses
  hu TP: házakból álló rozoga torony
  EN FP: a rickety old chair
  hu FP: rozoga öreg szék
2421 | fungus (noun): a mushroom-like thing that grows in damp places | loc: gomba
  EN TS: This fungus is big. Really big.
  hu TS: Ez a gomba nagy. Nagyon nagy.
  EN FS: This fungus is small. Really small.
  hu FS: Ez a gomba kicsi. Nagyon kicsi.
  EN TP: giant pale fungus
  hu TP: óriási sápadt gomba
  EN FP: fungus on old bread
  hu FP: penész a régi kenyéren
2422 | overalls (noun): trousers with straps over the shoulders | loc: kertésznadrág
  EN TS: She is reading in overalls.
  hu TS: Kertésznadrágban olvas.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in overalls.
  hu FS: Kertésznadrágban alszik.
  EN TP: blue denim overalls
  hu TP: kék farmer kertésznadrág
  EN FP: overalls covered in paint
  hu FP: festékes kertésznadrág
2424 | cypress (noun): a tall narrow dark-green tree | loc: ciprus
  EN TS: Cypresses grow on the left.
  hu TS: Bal oldalon ciprusok nőnek.
  EN FS: Cypresses grow on the right.
  hu FS: Jobb oldalon ciprusok nőnek.
  EN TP: a row of cypress trees
  hu TP: ciprusfasor
  EN FP: a cypress in a pot
  hu FP: ciprus cserépben
2425 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: keret
  EN TS: A black cat in a spooky frame!
  hu TS: Egy fekete macska egy kísérteties keretben!
  EN FS: A white cat in a spooky frame!
  hu FS: Egy fehér macska egy kísérteties keretben!
  EN TP: a frame with black roses
  hu TP: keret fekete rózsákkal
  EN FP: a frame for a bicycle
  hu FP: szemüvegkeret
2428 | monitor (noun): the screen you look at on a computer | loc: monitor
  EN TS: Three monitors, maximum focus.
  hu TS: Három monitor, maximális fókusz.
  EN FS: Two monitors, maximum focus.
  hu FS: Két monitor, maximális fókusz.
  EN TP: three large monitors
  hu TP: három nagy monitor
  EN FP: a baby monitor
  hu FP: bébimonitor
2429 | stag (noun): an adult male deer with large antlers | loc: szarvasbika
  EN TS: Yo, the stag is in a stream.
  hu TS: Figyu, a szarvasbika a patakban áll.
  EN FS: Yo, the stag is in a field.
  hu FS: Figyu, a szarvasbika a mezőn áll.
  EN TP: a stag in a stream
  hu TP: szarvasbika a patakban
  EN FP: a stag in the snow
  hu FP: szarvasbika a hóban
2430 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: folyni
  EN TS: The river flows past rocks.
  hu TS: A folyó sziklák mellett folyik el.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  hu FS: A folyó házak mellett folyik el.
  EN TP: a river flowing through rocks
  hu TP: sziklák között folyó folyó
  EN FP: a river flowing through town
  hu FP: városon átfolyó folyó
2432 | flamenco (noun): a fiery Spanish dance with fans and stamping | loc: flamenco
  EN TS: Her flamenco pose is fire!
  hu TS: Brutál ez a flamencopóz!
  EN FS: Her ballet pose is fire!
  hu FS: Brutál ez a balettpóz!
  EN TP: flamenco with a fan
  hu TP: flamenco legyezővel
  EN FP: flamenco on a stage
  hu FP: flamenco a színpadon
2433 | gallop (verb): how a horse runs at its fastest speed | loc: vágtázni
  EN TS: The horse is galloping at us!
  hu TS: A ló felénk vágtázik!
  EN FS: The donkey is galloping at us!
  hu FS: A szamár felénk vágtázik!
  EN TP: a galloping white horse
  hu TP: vágtázó fehér ló
  EN FP: a galloping black horse
  hu FP: vágtázó fekete ló
2434 | still life (noun): a painting of arranged objects like flowers | loc: csendélet
  EN TS: The still life shows blossoms.
  hu TS: A csendéleten virágzó ágak vannak.
  EN FS: The still life shows oranges.
  hu FS: A csendéleten narancsok vannak.
  EN TP: a still life with blossoms
  hu TP: csendélet virágokkal
  EN FP: a still life with fruit
  hu FP: csendélet gyümölcsökkel
2435 | pebble (noun): a small smooth round stone | loc: kavics
  EN TS: The stream is full of pebbles.
  hu TS: A patak tele van kavicsokkal.
  EN FS: The stream is full of fish.
  hu FS: A patak tele van halakkal.
  EN TP: smooth round pebbles
  hu TP: sima, kerek kavicsok
  EN FP: pebbles on a beach
  hu FP: kavicsok a strandon
2439 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: nedves
  EN TS: The street is wet at night.
  hu TS: Az utca éjjel nedves.
  EN FS: The street is dry at night.
  hu FS: Az utca éjjel száraz.
  EN TP: a wet night street
  hu TP: nedves éjszakai utca
  EN FP: a wet sandy beach
  hu FP: nedves homokos strand
2440 | electricity (noun): the energy made by moving electrons | loc: áram
  EN TS: The electricity is everywhere!
  hu TS: Mindenhol áram van!
  EN FS: The water is everywhere!
  hu FS: Mindenhol víz van!
  EN TP: sparks of electricity
  hu TP: áramszikrák
  EN FP: an electricity bill
  hu FP: áramszámla
2446 | shoelaces (noun): strings that tie your shoes or boots closed | loc: cipőfűző
  EN TS: Big bows, long shoelaces!
  hu TS: Nagy masnik, hosszú cipőfűzők!
  EN FS: Big bows, short shoelaces!
  hu FS: Nagy masnik, rövid cipőfűzők!
  EN TP: long yellow shoelaces
  hu TP: hosszú sárga cipőfűzők
  EN FP: broken yellow shoelaces
  hu FP: elszakadt sárga cipőfűzők
2449 | shop window (noun): a big glass front where a store shows its goods | loc: kirakat
  EN TS: Just a "few" glowing shop windows.
  hu TS: Csak „néhány” világító kirakat.
  EN FS: Just a "few" dark shop windows.
  hu FS: Csak „néhány” sötét kirakat.
  EN TP: glowing shop windows
  hu TP: világító kirakatok
  EN FP: a broken shop window
  hu FP: betört kirakat
2450 | thunderstorm (noun): a storm with lightning and loud rumbling | loc: zivatar
  EN TS: A thunderstorm over the water.
  hu TS: Zivatar a víz felett.
  EN FS: A thunderstorm over the city.
  hu FS: Zivatar a város felett.
  EN TP: a thunderstorm over water
  hu TP: zivatar a víz felett
  EN FP: a thunderstorm over a town
  hu FP: zivatar egy kisváros felett
2451 | eiffel tower (noun): the famous tall iron landmark in Paris | loc: Eiffel-torony
  EN TS: A bird near the Eiffel Tower.
  hu TS: Egy madár az Eiffel-torony közelében.
  EN FS: A plane near the Eiffel Tower.
  hu FS: Egy repülő az Eiffel-torony közelében.
  EN TP: the riverside Eiffel Tower
  hu TP: folyóparti Eiffel-torony
  EN FP: the Eiffel Tower in snow
  hu FP: havas Eiffel-torony
2452 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: romantikus
  EN TS: The snowy walk is romantic!
  hu TS: A havas séta romantikus!
  EN FS: The rainy walk is romantic!
  hu FS: Az esős séta romantikus!
  EN TP: a romantic snowy walk
  hu TP: romantikus havas séta
  EN FP: a romantic candle dinner
  hu FP: romantikus gyertyafényes vacsora
2454 | winding (adjective): curving and turning again and again | loc: kanyargós
  EN TS: The winding path has lanterns.
  hu TS: A kanyargós ösvényen lámpások vannak.
  EN FS: The straight path has lamps.
  hu FS: Az egyenes ösvényen lámpák vannak.
  EN TP: a winding cobblestone path
  hu TP: kanyargós macskaköves ösvény
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  hu FP: kanyargós hegyi folyó
2455 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: rövidnadrág
  EN TS: She wears green shorts.
  hu TS: Zöld rövidnadrágot visel.
  EN FS: She wears green trousers.
  hu FS: Zöld hosszúnadrágot visel.
  EN TP: green denim shorts
  hu TP: zöld farmer rövidnadrág
  EN FP: green swimming shorts
  hu FP: zöld fürdőnadrág
2457 | nurse (noun): a person who cares for sick people in a hospital | loc: nővér
  EN TS: The nurse has a stethoscope.
  hu TS: A nővérnek sztetoszkópja van.
  EN FS: The nurse has a clipboard.
  hu FS: A nővérnek csíptetős írótáblája van.
  EN TP: a nurse in uniform
  hu TP: egyenruhás nővér
  EN FP: a nurse with a baby
  hu FP: nővér egy babával
2458 | farmhouse (noun): the main house on a farm, where the farmer lives | loc: tanyaház
  EN TS: A farmhouse with lit windows.
  hu TS: Tanyaház kivilágított ablakokkal.
  EN FS: A farmhouse with dark windows.
  hu FS: Tanyaház sötét ablakokkal.
  EN TP: a farmhouse at sunset
  hu TP: tanyaház naplementekor
  EN FP: a farmhouse by the sea
  hu FP: tanyaház a tenger mellett
2460 | wildflowers (noun): flowers that grow by themselves in fields | loc: vadvirágok
  EN TS: Wildflowers in a blue pot, cute.
  hu TS: Vadvirágok egy kék cserépben, cuki.
  EN FS: Wildflowers in a red pot, cute.
  hu FS: Vadvirágok egy piros cserépben, cuki.
  EN TP: a pot of wildflowers
  hu TP: egy cserép vadvirág
  EN FP: a field of wildflowers
  hu FP: vadvirágos mező
2462 | starry (adjective): full of stars, said about a night sky | loc: csillagos
  EN TS: The starry sky has a moon.
  hu TS: A csillagos égen ott a hold.
  EN FS: The starry sky has a rainbow.
  hu FS: A csillagos égen ott a szivárvány.
  EN TP: a starry night sky
  hu TP: csillagos éjszakai égbolt
  EN FP: a starry city night
  hu FP: csillagos városi éjszaka
2463 | peony (noun): a big round flower with soft ruffled petals | loc: bazsarózsa
  EN TS: The valley features pink peonies.
  hu TS: A völgyet rózsaszín bazsarózsák díszítik.
  EN FS: The valley features pink tulips.
  hu FS: A völgyet rózsaszín tulipánok díszítik.
  EN TP: pink peonies on a hill
  hu TP: rózsaszín bazsarózsák egy dombon
  EN FP: peonies in a vase
  hu FP: bazsarózsák vázában
2464 | symmetrical (adjective): the same on both sides, like a mirror | loc: szimmetrikus
  EN TS: The patterns are symmetrical.
  hu TS: A minták szimmetrikusak.
  EN FS: The patterns are colourful.
  hu FS: A minták színesek.
  EN TP: symmetrical leaf patterns
  hu TP: szimmetrikus levélminták
  EN FP: a symmetrical building
  hu FP: szimmetrikus épület
2465 | float (verb): to stay up in the air without falling | loc: lebegni
  EN TS: She is floating. No big deal.
  hu TS: Lebeg. Semmi különös.
  EN FS: She is swimming. No big deal.
  hu FS: Úszik. Semmi különös.
  EN TP: floating in a blue sky
  hu TP: lebegés a kék égen
  EN FP: floating in a pool
  hu FP: lebegés a medencében
2466 | crystal (noun): a clear hard stone with flat shiny faces | loc: kristály
  EN TS: Her dress is made of crystals.
  hu TS: A ruhája kristályokból van.
  EN FS: Her dress is made of feathers.
  hu FS: A ruhája tollakból van.
  EN TP: a dress of glowing crystals
  hu TP: világító kristályokból álló ruha
  EN FP: a crystal glass of water
  hu FP: kristálypohár víz
2470 | saxophone (noun): a curved metal wind instrument used in jazz | loc: szaxofon
  EN TS: The saxophone has a curved bell.
  hu TS: A szaxofonnak ívelt tölcsére van.
  EN FS: The saxophone has a straight bell.
  hu FS: A szaxofonnak egyenes tölcsére van.
  EN TP: a floating saxophone
  hu TP: lebegő szaxofon
  EN FP: a saxophone player
  hu FP: szaxofonos
2471 | bookworm (noun): a person who reads all the time | loc: könyvmoly
  EN TS: She is such a bookworm.
  hu TS: Igazi könyvmoly.
  EN FS: She is such a gamer.
  hu FS: Igazi gamer.
  EN TP: a bookworm with a book
  hu TP: könyvmoly egy könyvvel
  EN FP: a bookworm with a phone
  hu FP: könyvmoly egy telefonnal
2472 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: egyenruha
  EN TS: Her uniform looks really neat.
  hu TS: Az egyenruhája nagyon rendezett.
  EN FS: Her coat looks really neat.
  hu FS: A kabátja nagyon rendezett.
  EN TP: a school uniform
  hu TP: iskolai egyenruha
  EN FP: a police uniform
  hu FP: rendőrségi egyenruha
2473 | wreath (noun): a ring of leaves hung up as decoration | loc: koszorú
  EN TS: The wreath is on a red door.
  hu TS: A koszorú egy piros ajtón van.
  EN FS: The wreath is on a blue door.
  hu FS: A koszorú egy kék ajtón van.
  EN TP: a wreath on the door
  hu TP: koszorú az ajtón
  EN FP: a wreath on her head
  hu FP: koszorú a fején
2474 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: hab
  EN TS: Wild foam on a stormy sea.
  hu TS: Vad hab a viharos tengeren.
  EN FS: Wild foam on a calm sea.
  hu FS: Vad hab a nyugodt tengeren.
  EN TP: foam on stormy waves
  hu TP: hab a viharos hullámokon
  EN FP: coffee with milk foam
  hu FP: kávé tejhabbal
2475 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: mezítlábas
  EN TS: She is reading barefoot.
  hu TS: Mezítláb olvas.
  EN FS: She is dancing barefoot.
  hu FS: Mezítláb táncol.
  EN TP: barefoot on a daybed
  hu TP: mezítláb egy heverőn
  EN FP: barefoot on the beach
  hu FP: mezítláb a strandon
2477 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: kócos
  EN TS: The wind made his hair messy.
  hu TS: A szél kócossá tette a haját.
  EN FS: The rain made his hair messy.
  hu FS: Az eső kócossá tette a haját.
  EN TP: messy brown hair
  hu TP: kócos barna haj
  EN FP: a messy bedroom
  hu FP: rendetlen hálószoba
2478 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: orvos
  EN TS: The doctor is smiling at us.
  hu TS: Az orvos ránk mosolyog.
  EN FS: The doctor is shouting at us.
  hu FS: Az orvos ránk kiabál.
  EN TP: a smiling cartoon doctor
  hu TP: mosolygó rajzfilm-orvos
  EN FP: a doctor in surgery
  hu FP: orvos műtét közben
2480 | present (noun): a gift you give someone | loc: ajándék
  EN TS: The car has too many presents!
  hu TS: Túl sok ajándék van az autón!
  EN FS: The car has too many dogs!
  hu FS: Túl sok kutya van az autón!
  EN TP: presents on a car roof
  hu TP: ajándékok az autó tetején
  EN FP: presents under a tree
  hu FP: ajándékok a fa alatt
2481 | globe (noun): a small round model of the Earth on a stand | loc: földgömb
  EN TS: He is holding a globe.
  hu TS: Egy földgömböt tart.
  EN FS: He is holding a ball.
  hu FS: Egy labdát tart.
  EN TP: holding a globe
  hu TP: földgömböt tart
  EN FP: a snow globe
  hu FP: hógömb
2482 | turret (noun): a small round tower on a big building | loc: tornyocska
  EN TS: So many turrets on one castle!
  hu TS: Ennyi tornyocska egy kastélyon!
  EN FS: So many flags on one castle!
  hu FS: Ennyi zászló egy kastélyon!
  EN TP: pointed castle turrets
  hu TP: hegyes kastélytornyocskák
  EN FP: a tank turret
  hu FP: tank lövegtornya
2483 | dried (adjective): with all the water taken out to keep it | loc: szárított
  EN TS: Dried flowers lie in the book.
  hu TS: Szárított virágok vannak a könyvben.
  EN FS: Fresh flowers lie in the book.
  hu FS: Friss virágok vannak a könyvben.
  EN TP: dried flowers in a book
  hu TP: szárított virágok egy könyvben
  EN FP: dried fruit in a bowl
  hu FP: szárított gyümölcs egy tálban
2484 | steeple (noun): the tall pointed tower of a church | loc: templomtorony
  EN TS: The church has a tall steeple.
  hu TS: Ez egy magas templomtorony.
  EN FS: The castle has a tall steeple.
  hu FS: Ez egy magas kastélytorony.
  EN TP: a church steeple in snow
  hu TP: templomtorony a hóban
  EN FP: a steeple in a city
  hu FP: templomtorony egy városban
2485 | sinister (adjective): looking evil, as if something bad will happen | loc: baljós
  EN TS: The crow man looks sinister.
  hu TS: A varjúember baljósnak tűnik.
  EN FS: The cat man looks sinister.
  hu FS: A macskaember baljósnak tűnik.
  EN TP: a sinister crow-headed figure
  hu TP: baljós varjúfejű alak
  EN FP: a sinister black cat
  hu FP: baljós fekete macska
2486 | hieroglyphs (noun): the picture symbols of ancient Egyptian writing | loc: hieroglifák
  EN TS: Hieroglyphs cover the wall.
  hu TS: Hieroglifák borítják a falat.
  EN FS: Flowers cover the wall.
  hu FS: Virágok borítják a falat.
  EN TP: a wall of hieroglyphs
  hu TP: hieroglifákkal teli fal
  EN FP: hieroglyphs in a textbook
  hu FP: hieroglifák egy tankönyvben
2490 | snowman (noun): a winter figure made of big white frozen balls | loc: hóember
  EN TS: Nice hat! Is the snowman cold?
  hu TS: Szép kalap! Fázik a hóember?
  EN FS: Nice hat! Is the dog cold?
  hu FS: Szép kalap! Fázik a kutya?
  EN TP: a snowman in a hat
  hu TP: hóember kalapban
  EN FP: building a snowman
  hu FP: hóemberépítés
2492 | busy (adjective): full of people and activity | loc: forgalmas
  EN TS: The village is so busy!
  hu TS: Olyan forgalmas a falu!
  EN FS: The village is so quiet!
  hu FS: Olyan csendes a falu!
  EN TP: a busy snowy village
  hu TP: forgalmas havas falu
  EN FP: a busy summer beach
  hu FP: forgalmas nyári strand
2493 | quilt (noun): a warm cover sewn from many pieces of cloth | loc: foltvarrott takaró
  EN TS: The farm is sewn as a quilt.
  hu TS: A farm foltvarrott takaróként van megvarrva.
  EN FS: The farm is sewn as a flag.
  hu FS: A farm zászlóként van megvarrva.
  EN TP: a quilt of a farm
  hu TP: farmot ábrázoló foltvarrott takaró
  EN FP: a quilt on a bed
  hu FP: foltvarrott takaró az ágyon
2494 | victorian (adjective): in the style of 19th-century England | loc: viktoriánus
  EN TS: Victorian street. Is that Sherlock?
  hu TS: Viktoriánus utca. Az ott Sherlock?
  EN FS: Modern street. Is that Sherlock?
  hu FS: Modern utca. Az ott Sherlock?
  EN TP: a snowy Victorian street
  hu TP: havas viktoriánus utca
  EN FP: a Victorian tea party
  hu FP: viktoriánus teadélután
2495 | sparrow (noun): a small brown bird you see everywhere | loc: veréb
  EN TS: I counted two sparrows.
  hu TS: Két verebet számoltam.
  EN FS: I counted four sparrows.
  hu FS: Négy verebet számoltam.
  EN TP: two sparrows on a branch
  hu TP: két veréb egy ágon
  EN FP: two sparrows in the snow
  hu FP: két veréb a hóban
2497 | santa claus (noun): the jolly man in red who brings Christmas presents | loc: Mikulás
  EN TS: Santa Claus is taking a break.
  hu TS: A Mikulás szünetet tart.
  EN FS: Santa Claus is taking a bath.
  hu FS: A Mikulás fürdőt vesz.
  EN TP: Santa Claus with presents
  hu TP: Mikulás ajándékokkal
  EN FP: Santa Claus with reindeer
  hu FP: Mikulás rénszarvasokkal
2498 | tender (adjective): gentle and full of love | loc: gyengéd
  EN TS: They share a tender hug.
  hu TS: Gyengéden átölelik egymást.
  EN FS: They share a tender kiss.
  hu FS: Gyengéden megcsókolják egymást.
  EN TP: a tender embrace
  hu TP: gyengéd ölelés
  EN FP: a tender steak
  hu FP: gyengéd kézfogás
2499 | teddy bear (noun): a soft cuddly toy animal for children | loc: plüssmaci
  EN TS: Two teddy bears are cuddling.
  hu TS: Két plüssmaci ölelkezik.
  EN FS: Two teddy bears are fighting.
  hu FS: Két plüssmaci verekszik.
  EN TP: teddy bears in the snow
  hu TP: plüssmacik a hóban
  EN FP: teddy bears on a bed
  hu FP: plüssmacik az ágyon
2500 | laptop (noun): a small computer you can carry and fold shut | loc: laptop
  EN TS: He is typing on a laptop.
  hu TS: Egy laptopon gépel.
  EN FS: He is typing on a phone.
  hu FS: Egy telefonon gépel.
  EN TP: typing on a laptop
  hu TP: gépelés laptopon
  EN FP: carrying a laptop
  hu FP: laptop cipelése
2501 | shiva (noun): the Hindu god with blue skin and a trident | loc: Siva
  EN TS: Shiva is meditating on a rock.
  hu TS: Siva egy sziklán meditál.
  EN FS: Shiva is meditating in a boat.
  hu FS: Siva egy csónakban meditál.
  EN TP: Shiva with a trident
  hu TP: Siva háromágú szigonnyal
  EN FP: Shiva with a sword
  hu FP: Siva karddal
2502 | shrine (noun): a small holy place built to honour someone | loc: szentély
  EN TS: A forest shrine full of moss.
  hu TS: Mohával teli erdei szentély.
  EN FS: A desert shrine full of sand.
  hu FS: Homokkal teli sivatagi szentély.
  EN TP: a mossy forest shrine
  hu TP: mohás erdei szentély
  EN FP: a shrine in a city
  hu FP: szentély egy városban
2504 | krishna (noun): a Hindu god shown with blue skin | loc: Krisna
  EN TS: Krishna has a peacock feather.
  hu TS: Krisnának pávatolla van.
  EN FS: Krishna has an eagle feather.
  hu FS: Krisnának sastolla van.
  EN TP: Krishna with a crown
  hu TP: Krisna koronával
  EN FP: Krishna with a flute
  hu FP: Krisna fuvolával
2505 | rifle (noun): a long gun you hold with two hands | loc: puska
  EN TS: Rain, a rifle and zero complaints.
  hu TS: Eső, egy puska és nulla panasz.
  EN FS: Sun, a rifle and zero complaints.
  hu FS: Napsütés, egy puska és nulla panasz.
  EN TP: a long scoped rifle
  hu TP: hosszú, távcsöves puska
  EN FP: a rifle on the ground
  hu FP: puska a földön
2506 | geometric (adjective): made of simple regular shapes like squares | loc: geometrikus
  EN TS: Everything here is geometric.
  hu TS: Itt minden geometrikus.
  EN FS: Everything here is blue.
  hu FS: Itt minden kék.
  EN TP: pink geometric shapes
  hu TP: rózsaszín geometrikus formák
  EN FP: a geometric maths test
  hu FP: geometriadolgozat
2509 | lavender (noun): a purple plant with a famous sweet smell | loc: levendula
  EN TS: A path runs through lavender.
  hu TS: Egy ösvény vezet át a levendulán.
  EN FS: A path runs through wheat.
  hu FS: Egy ösvény vezet át a búzán.
  EN TP: rows of purple lavender
  hu TP: lila levendulasorok
  EN FP: a bottle of lavender oil
  hu FP: egy üveg levendulaolaj
2510 | bedtime (noun): the time when you go to sleep | loc: lefekvés ideje
  EN TS: Bedtime for a boy and a cat!
  hu TS: Lefekvés ideje egy fiúnak és egy macskának!
  EN FS: Bedtime for a boy and a dog!
  hu FS: Lefekvés ideje egy fiúnak és egy kutyának!
  EN TP: bedtime under a blanket
  hu TP: lefekvés ideje a takaró alatt
  EN FP: bedtime story with a book
  hu FP: esti mese egy könyvvel
2511 | spark (noun): a tiny glowing bit of fire in the air | loc: szikra
  EN TS: Sparks are flying around them.
  hu TS: Szikrák repkednek körülöttük.
  EN FS: Leaves are flying around them.
  hu FS: Levelek repkednek körülöttük.
  EN TP: sparks around a couple
  hu TP: szikrák egy pár körül
  EN FP: a spark from a plug
  hu FP: szikra a konnektorból
2512 | coloring book (noun): a set of outline pictures for kids to paint in | loc: kifestőkönyv
  EN TS: This coloring book needs you.
  hu TS: Ez a kifestőkönyv rád vár.
  EN FS: This photo book needs you.
  hu FS: Ez a fotóalbum rád vár.
  EN TP: a coloring book page
  hu TP: kifestőkönyv-oldal
  EN FP: a coloring book cover
  hu FP: kifestőkönyv borítója
2514 | herbs (noun): leafy plants used in cooking, tea or medicine | loc: gyógynövények
  EN TS: She's adding herbs to a bowl.
  hu TS: Gyógynövényeket tesz egy tálba.
  EN FS: She's adding salt to a bowl.
  hu FS: Sót tesz egy tálba.
  EN TP: sprinkling dried herbs
  hu TP: szárított gyógynövények szórása
  EN FP: chopping fresh herbs
  hu FP: friss gyógynövények aprítása
2516 | year (noun): a period of twelve months | loc: év
  EN TS: The year is 2024.
  hu TS: Ez a 2024-es év.
  EN FS: The year is 2025.
  hu FS: Ez a 2025-ös év.
  EN TP: the year 2024 glowing
  hu TP: az izzó 2024-es év
  EN FP: the year 2025
  hu FP: a 2025-ös év
2519 | backyard (noun): the private grassy area behind a house | loc: hátsó udvar
  EN TS: Did you see this backyard? A flamingo!
  hu TS: Láttad ezt a hátsó udvart? Egy flamingó!
  EN FS: Did you see this backyard? A swing!
  hu FS: Láttad ezt a hátsó udvart? Egy hinta!
  EN TP: a busy little backyard
  hu TP: nyüzsgő kis hátsó udvar
  EN FP: a backyard vegetable patch
  hu FP: veteményes a hátsó udvarban
2520 | sacred (adjective): holy and connected to religion | loc: szent
  EN TS: A sacred light from above!
  hu TS: Szent fény felülről!
  EN FS: A sacred light from below!
  hu FS: Szent fény alulról!
  EN TP: a sacred beam of light
  hu TP: szent fénysugár
  EN FP: a sacred river
  hu FP: szent folyó
2522 | clover (noun): a small plant with round leaves, a lucky sign | loc: lóhere
  EN TS: The clovers have four leaves.
  hu TS: A lóheréknek négy levelük van.
  EN FS: The clovers have three leaves.
  hu FS: A lóheréknek három levelük van.
  EN TP: four-leaf clovers
  hu TP: négylevelű lóherék
  EN FP: a clover field with cows
  hu FP: lóheremező tehenekkel
2523 | snowfall (noun): snow coming down from the sky | loc: havazás
  EN TS: The snowfall is heavy tonight.
  hu TS: Ma éjjel erős a havazás.
  EN FS: The rainfall is heavy tonight.
  hu FS: Ma éjjel erős az esőzés.
  EN TP: heavy snowfall over a village
  hu TP: erős havazás egy falu felett
  EN FP: light snowfall in a city
  hu FP: enyhe havazás a városban
2524 | walking stick (noun): a stick you lean on to help you walk | loc: sétabot
  EN TS: He has a walking stick.
  hu TS: Sétabotja van.
  EN FS: He has a big umbrella.
  hu FS: Nagy esernyője van.
  EN TP: leaning on a walking stick
  hu TP: sétabotra támaszkodik
  EN FP: a walking stick for hiking
  hu FP: sétabot túrázáshoz
2525 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: felemelni
  EN TS: Mum is lifting her baby bear.
  hu TS: Anya felemeli a medvebocsát.
  EN FS: Mum is lifting her baby fox.
  hu FS: Anya felemeli a rókakölykét.
  EN TP: to lift the cub up
  hu TP: felemelni a bocsot
  EN FP: to lift a heavy box
  hu FP: felemelni egy nehéz dobozt
2526 | poseidon (noun): the ancient Greek god of the sea | loc: Poszeidón
  EN TS: Poseidon has two spears.
  hu TS: Poszeidónnak két lándzsája van.
  EN FS: Poseidon has two swords.
  hu FS: Poszeidónnak két kardja van.
  EN TP: Poseidon rising from waves
  hu TP: a hullámokból kiemelkedő Poszeidón
  EN FP: Poseidon sinking a ship
  hu FP: hajót elsüllyesztő Poszeidón
2527 | gas mask (noun): a mask that protects your face from dangerous air | loc: gázálarc
  EN TS: The DJ wears a gas mask. Why?
  hu TS: A DJ gázálarcot visel. Miért?
  EN FS: The DJ wears a ski mask. Why?
  hu FS: A DJ símaszkot visel. Miért?
  EN TP: gas mask and headphones
  hu TP: gázálarc és fejhallgató
  EN FP: gas mask and goggles
  hu FP: gázálarc és védőszemüveg
2528 | top hat (noun): a tall formal hat with a flat top | loc: cilinder
  EN TS: A purple top hat? Bold choice.
  hu TS: Lila cilinder? Merész választás.
  EN FS: A black top hat? Bold choice.
  hu FS: Fekete cilinder? Merész választás.
  EN TP: a shiny purple top hat
  hu TP: fényes lila cilinder
  EN FP: a magician's top hat
  hu FP: bűvész cilindere
2529 | gentle (adjective): kind, calm and soft in the way you act | loc: gyengéd
  EN TS: He has a gentle face.
  hu TS: Gyengéd arca van.
  EN FS: He has a gentle dog.
  hu FS: Gyengéd kutyája van.
  EN TP: a gentle calm face
  hu TP: gyengéd, nyugodt arc
  EN FP: a gentle calm sea
  hu FP: gyengéd, nyugodt tenger
2530 | candlelight (noun): the warm light of a burning candle | loc: gyertyafény
  EN TS: Candlelight glows among roses.
  hu TS: Gyertyafény ragyog a rózsák között.
  EN FS: Candlelight glows among books.
  hu FS: Gyertyafény ragyog a könyvek között.
  EN TP: candlelight in a lantern
  hu TP: gyertyafény egy lámpásban
  EN FP: candlelight on a cake
  hu FP: gyertyafény egy tortán
2531 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: csillog
  EN TS: Even the sky sparkles for them.
  hu TS: Még az ég is csillog nekik.
  EN FS: Even the sea sparkles for them.
  hu FS: Még a tenger is csillog nekik.
  EN TP: a sparkling night sky
  hu TP: csillogó éjszakai égbolt
  EN FP: sparkling water in a glass
  hu FP: buborékos víz egy pohárban
2532 | ruffle (noun): a strip of frilly fabric used as trim | loc: fodor
  EN TS: Her dress has grey ruffles.
  hu TS: A ruháján szürke fodrok vannak.
  EN FS: Her dress has red ruffles.
  hu FS: A ruháján piros fodrok vannak.
  EN TP: a dress with grey ruffles
  hu TP: ruha szürke fodrokkal
  EN FP: ruffles on a red hat
  hu FP: fodrok egy piros kalapon
2533 | misty (adjective): covered in thin fog that hides things | loc: ködös
  EN TS: The far end is misty.
  hu TS: A túlsó vége ködös.
  EN FS: The far end is sunny.
  hu FS: A túlsó vége napos.
  EN TP: a misty old street
  hu TP: ködös régi utca
  EN FP: a misty mountain lake
  hu FP: ködös hegyi tó
2536 | chimpanzee (noun): a large clever African ape with dark hair | loc: csimpánz
  EN TS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious biker.
  hu TS: Ez a csimpánz úgy néz ki, mint egy komoly motoros.
  EN FS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious surfer.
  hu FS: Ez a csimpánz úgy néz ki, mint egy komoly szörfös.
  EN TP: a chimpanzee on a motorbike
  hu TP: csimpánz motoron
  EN FP: a chimpanzee in a tree
  hu FP: csimpánz egy fán
2537 | bedtime story (noun): a story read to children before sleep | loc: esti mese
  EN TS: The girl is reading a bedtime story.
  hu TS: A lány esti mesét olvas.
  EN FS: The boy is reading a bedtime story.
  hu FS: A fiú esti mesét olvas.
  EN TP: a bedtime story in bed
  hu TP: esti mese az ágyban
  EN FP: a bedtime story on TV
  hu FP: esti mese a tévében
2538 | little red riding hood (noun): the fairy-tale girl in a red hooded cloak | loc: Piroska
  EN TS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the wolf.
  hu TS: Piroska megbízik a farkasban.
  EN FS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the bear.
  hu FS: Piroska megbízik a medvében.
  EN TP: Little Red Riding Hood's wolf
  hu TP: Piroska farkasa
  EN FP: Little Red Riding Hood's gran
  hu FP: Piroska nagymamája
2539 | artificial intelligence (noun): computer systems that think and learn | loc: mesterséges intelligencia
  EN TS: Artificial intelligence lives in her head.
  hu TS: Mesterséges intelligencia él a fejében.
  EN FS: Artificial intelligence lives in her car.
  hu FS: Mesterséges intelligencia él az autójában.
  EN TP: artificial intelligence robot
  hu TP: mesterséges intelligenciájú robot
  EN FP: artificial intelligence app
  hu FP: mesterséges intelligencia app
2540 | dungeon (noun): a dark prison under a castle | loc: tömlöc
  EN TS: What a "cosy" dungeon.
  hu TS: Micsoda „hangulatos” tömlöc.
  EN FS: What a "cosy" garden.
  hu FS: Micsoda „hangulatos” kert.
  EN TP: a dark dungeon with candles
  hu TP: sötét tömlöc gyertyákkal
  EN FP: a dark cellar with wine
  hu FP: sötét pince borral
2541 | staircase (noun): a set of stairs inside a building | loc: lépcsőház
  EN TS: Nobody cleaned this staircase.
  hu TS: Ezt a lépcsőházat senki sem takarította.
  EN FS: Nobody cleaned this kitchen.
  hu FS: Ezt a konyhát senki sem takarította.
  EN TP: a crumbling stone staircase
  hu TP: omladozó kő lépcsőház
  EN FP: a crumbling stone bridge
  hu FP: omladozó kőhíd
2543 | tusk (noun): one of the two long teeth of an elephant | loc: agyar
  EN TS: The elephant has long tusks.
  hu TS: Az elefántnak hosszú agyarai vannak.
  EN FS: The elephant has short tusks.
  hu FS: Az elefántnak rövid agyarai vannak.
  EN TP: two long white tusks
  hu TP: két hosszú fehér agyar
  EN FP: a walrus with tusks
  hu FP: rozmár agyarakkal
2544 | hanuman (noun): the Hindu monkey god with a crown and mace | loc: Hanumán
  EN TS: Hanuman has a golden crown.
  hu TS: Hanumánnak aranykoronája van.
  EN FS: Hanuman has a silver crown.
  hu FS: Hanumánnak ezüstkoronája van.
  EN TP: Hanuman with a golden staff
  hu TP: Hanumán arany bottal
  EN FP: Hanuman with a sword
  hu FP: Hanumán karddal
2545 | worship (verb): to show deep love and respect to a god | loc: imád
  EN TS: The monkey is worshipping.
  hu TS: A majom az istenét imádja.
  EN FS: The monkey is sleeping.
  hu FS: A majom alszik.
  EN TP: worshipping on stone steps
  hu TP: imádat a kőlépcsőn
  EN FP: worshipping a football star
  hu FP: egy focisztár imádata
2546 | spacious (adjective): having a lot of open room inside | loc: tágas
  EN TS: This hall is "quite" spacious.
  hu TS: Ez a terem „egészen” tágas.
  EN FS: This hall is "quite" tiny.
  hu FS: Ez a terem „egészen” apró.
  EN TP: a spacious hall
  hu TP: tágas terem
  EN FP: a spacious car
  hu FP: tágas autó
2547 | toadstool (noun): a mushroom with a red cap and white spots | loc: légyölő galóca
  EN TS: These toadstools are massive!
  hu TS: Ezek a légyölő galócák hatalmasak!
  EN FS: These toadstools are tiny!
  hu FS: Ezek a légyölő galócák aprók!
  EN TP: giant red toadstools
  hu TP: óriási légyölő galócák
  EN FP: toadstools in a basket
  hu FP: légyölő galócák egy kosárban
2548 | barrel (noun): a big round wooden container | loc: hordó
  EN TS: So many barrels. Beer, maybe?
  hu TS: Mennyi hordó. Talán sör?
  EN FS: So many bikes. Beer, maybe?
  hu FS: Mennyi bicikli. Talán sör?
  EN TP: stacked wooden barrels
  hu TP: egymásra rakott fahordók
  EN FP: a barrel of cold beer
  hu FP: egy hordó hideg sör
2549 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: apa
  EN TS: Father and son are cheering!
  hu TS: Apa és fia ujjonganak!
  EN FS: Father and son are crying!
  hu FS: Apa és fia sírnak!
  EN TP: a father carrying his son
  hu TP: fiát cipelő apa
  EN FP: a father carrying shopping
  hu FP: bevásárlást cipelő apa
2550 | cross-legged (adverb): sitting with your legs bent and crossed | loc: törökülésben
  EN TS: She sits cross-legged, barefoot.
  hu TS: Törökülésben ül, mezítláb.
  EN FS: She sits cross-legged in boots.
  hu FS: Törökülésben ül, csizmában.
  EN TP: sitting cross-legged
  hu TP: törökülésben ülve
  EN FP: standing cross-legged
  hu FP: törökülésben állva
2551 | miami (noun): the Florida beach city of neon and palms | loc: Miami
  EN TS: Miami vibes: palms and neon.
  hu TS: Miami vibe: pálmák és neon.
  EN FS: Miami vibes: snow and neon.
  hu FS: Miami vibe: hó és neon.
  EN TP: a neon Miami street
  hu TP: neonfényes miami utca
  EN FP: a Miami beach at noon
  hu FP: miami strand délben
2552 | virtual reality (noun): a computer world seen through special goggles | loc: virtuális valóság
  EN TS: She is in virtual reality.
  hu TS: Virtuális valóságban van.
  EN FS: She is in a swimming pool.
  hu FS: Egy uszodában van.
  EN TP: a virtual reality headset
  hu TP: virtuálisvalóság-szemüveg
  EN FP: virtual reality at school
  hu FP: virtuális valóság az iskolában
2556 | brain (noun): the organ in the head we think with | loc: agy
  EN TS: Fact: the brain is glowing.
  hu TS: Tény: az agy világít.
  EN FS: Fact: the heart is glowing.
  hu FS: Tény: a szív világít.
  EN TP: a glowing brain
  hu TP: világító agy
  EN FP: a brain in a jar
  hu FP: agy egy befőttesüvegben
2557 | sailboat (noun): a small boat pushed along by the wind | loc: vitorlás
  EN TS: Wait, the sailboat is glass?
  hu TS: Várj, a vitorlás üvegből van?
  EN FS: Wait, the sailboat is wood?
  hu FS: Várj, a vitorlás fából van?
  EN TP: a glass sailboat
  hu TP: üveg vitorlás
  EN FP: a sailboat in a bottle
  hu FP: palackba zárt vitorlás
2558 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: szabadság
  EN TS: She is flying. Pure freedom!
  hu TS: Repül. Tiszta szabadság!
  EN FS: She is swimming. Pure freedom!
  hu FS: Úszik. Tiszta szabadság!
  EN TP: freedom above the sea
  hu TP: szabadság a tenger fölött
  EN FP: freedom under the sea
  hu FP: szabadság a tenger alatt
2559 | coin (noun): a flat metal piece used as money | loc: érme
  EN TS: This tree grows coins!
  hu TS: Ezen a fán érmék nőnek!
  EN FS: This tree grows apples!
  hu FS: Ezen a fán almák nőnek!
  EN TP: coins falling from a tree
  hu TP: fáról hulló érmék
  EN FP: coins in a piggy bank
  hu FP: érmék egy malacperselyben
2560 | miracle (noun): an amazing event that cannot be explained | loc: csoda
  EN TS: Walking on water? A miracle!
  hu TS: Vízen járni? Csoda!
  EN FS: Walking on fire? A miracle!
  hu FS: Tűzön járni? Csoda!
  EN TP: a miracle on the ocean
  hu TP: csoda az óceánon
  EN FP: a miracle cure for colds
  hu FP: csodaszer megfázásra
2562 | detective (noun): a person whose job is to solve crimes | loc: nyomozó
  EN TS: Rainy night, lonely detective.
  hu TS: Esős éjszaka, magányos nyomozó.
  EN FS: Sunny day, lonely detective.
  hu FS: Napos nap, magányos nyomozó.
  EN TP: a detective in the rain
  hu TP: nyomozó az esőben
  EN FP: a crime scene detective
  hu FP: helyszínelő nyomozó
2563 | merchant (noun): a person who buys and sells goods | loc: kereskedő
  EN TS: A merchant is checking grain.
  hu TS: Egy kereskedő gabonát ellenőriz.
  EN FS: A merchant is checking coins.
  hu FS: Egy kereskedő érméket ellenőriz.
  EN TP: a merchant by candlelight
  hu TP: kereskedő gyertyafénynél
  EN FP: a merchant at the market
  hu FP: kereskedő a piacon
2564 | hydrangea (noun): a garden plant with round clusters of flowers | loc: hortenzia
  EN TS: This hydrangea cluster is blue.
  hu TS: Ez a hortenziafürt kék.
  EN FS: This hydrangea cluster is pink.
  hu FS: Ez a hortenziafürt rózsaszín.
  EN TP: a blue hydrangea cluster
  hu TP: kék hortenziafürt
  EN FP: a hydrangea in a vase
  hu FP: hortenzia vázában
2567 | saint (noun): a very holy person honoured in religion | loc: szent
  EN TS: The saint wears a white veil.
  hu TS: A szent fehér fátylat visel.
  EN FS: The saint wears a red veil.
  hu FS: A szent piros fátylat visel.
  EN TP: a saint with a halo
  hu TP: szent glóriával
  EN FP: a saint on a horse
  hu FP: szent lóháton
2571 | grumpy (adjective): in a bad mood and easily annoyed | loc: morcos
  EN TS: The boy is grumpy. Again.
  hu TS: A fiú morcos. Megint.
  EN FS: The girl is grumpy. Again.
  hu FS: A lány morcos. Megint.
  EN TP: a grumpy little boy
  hu TP: morcos kisfiú
  EN FP: a grumpy old man
  hu FP: morcos öregember
2572 | triangle (noun): a flat shape with three straight sides | loc: háromszög
  EN TS: The triangles are glowing.
  hu TS: A háromszögek világítanak.
  EN FS: The circles are glowing.
  hu FS: A körök világítanak.
  EN TP: glowing neon triangles
  hu TP: világító neon háromszögek
  EN FP: a triangle road sign
  hu FP: háromszög alakú közlekedési tábla
2575 | anonymous (adjective): with the name and face kept hidden | loc: névtelen
  EN TS: The DJ is totally anonymous.
  hu TS: A DJ teljesen névtelen.
  EN FS: The chef is totally anonymous.
  hu FS: A séf teljesen névtelen.
  EN TP: an anonymous hooded DJ
  hu TP: névtelen, kapucnis DJ
  EN FP: an anonymous letter
  hu FP: névtelen levél
2576 | heartbroken (adjective): extremely sad after losing someone you love | loc: összetört szívű
  EN TS: He is heartbroken in Paris.
  hu TS: Összetört a szíve Párizsban.
  EN FS: He is heartbroken in Rome.
  hu FS: Összetört a szíve Rómában.
  EN TP: heartbroken in the rain
  hu TP: összetört szívvel az esőben
  EN FP: heartbroken in the snow
  hu FP: összetört szívvel a hóban
2578 | visor (noun): the clear front part of a helmet | loc: rostély
  EN TS: The visor is like a mirror.
  hu TS: A rostély olyan, mint egy tükör.
  EN FS: The visor is like a window.
  hu FS: A rostély olyan, mint egy ablak.
  EN TP: a mirrored helmet visor
  hu TP: tükröződő sisakrostély
  EN FP: a cap with a visor
  hu FP: siltes sapka
2579 | weird (adjective): strange and not normal | loc: fura
  EN TS: Her glasses are super weird.
  hu TS: A szemüvege szuper fura.
  EN FS: Her hat is super weird.
  hu FS: A kalapja szuper fura.
  EN TP: a weird retro machine
  hu TP: fura retró gép
  EN FP: a weird old car
  hu FP: fura öreg autó
2580 | archer (noun): a person who shoots with a bow and arrow | loc: íjász
  EN TS: The archer is drawing his bow.
  hu TS: Az íjász megfeszíti az íját.
  EN FS: The archer is drawing a sword.
  hu FS: Az íjász kardot ránt.
  EN TP: a statue of an archer
  hu TP: íjászszobor
  EN FP: a painting of an archer
  hu FP: íjászt ábrázoló festmény
2581 | flute (noun): a long thin instrument you blow across | loc: fuvola
  EN TS: He is playing a bamboo flute.
  hu TS: Bambuszfuvolán játszik.
  EN FS: He is playing a bamboo drum.
  hu FS: Bambuszdobon játszik.
  EN TP: playing a bamboo flute
  hu TP: bambuszfuvolán játszik
  EN FP: carving a bamboo flute
  hu FP: bambuszfuvolát farag
2583 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: élvezni
  EN TS: She is enjoying the vibes.
  hu TS: Nagyon élvezi a vibe-ot.
  EN FS: She is enjoying the pizza.
  hu FS: Nagyon élvezi a pizzát.
  EN TP: enjoying the music
  hu TP: a zene élvezete
  EN FP: enjoying the sun
  hu FP: a napsütés élvezete
2584 | baptism (noun): a religious ceremony using water | loc: keresztelő
  EN TS: It's a baptism in a river.
  hu TS: Ez egy keresztelő a folyóban.
  EN FS: It's a baptism in a church.
  hu FS: Ez egy keresztelő a templomban.
  EN TP: a baptism in the river
  hu TP: keresztelő a folyóban
  EN FP: a church baptism
  hu FP: templomi keresztelő
2586 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: barátság
  EN TS: Best friendship ever: a giant robot and a little girl.
  hu TS: A legjobb barátság ever: egy óriásrobot és egy kislány.
  EN FS: Best friendship ever: a giant dog and a little girl.
  hu FS: A legjobb barátság ever: egy óriáskutya és egy kislány.
  EN TP: an unlikely friendship
  hu TP: valószínűtlen barátság
  EN FP: a friendship bracelet
  hu FP: barátságkarkötő
2594 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: tanulni
  EN TS: The robot is learning about itself.
  hu TS: A robot önmagáról tanul.
  EN FS: The robot is learning about cats.
  hu FS: A robot a macskákról tanul.
  EN TP: a robot learning to read
  hu TP: olvasni tanuló robot
  EN FP: a robot learning to fly
  hu FP: repülni tanuló robot
2595 | grand piano (noun): a large piano with a big lid that opens up | loc: koncertzongora
  EN TS: Someone left a grand piano outside.
  hu TS: Valaki kint hagyott egy koncertzongorát.
  EN FS: Someone left a grand piano inside.
  hu FS: Valaki bent hagyott egy koncertzongorát.
  EN TP: a grand piano outside
  hu TP: koncertzongora a szabadban
  EN FP: a grand piano inside
  hu FP: koncertzongora egy teremben
2600 | beetle (noun): an insect with a hard shiny back | loc: bogár
  EN TS: Bro, two beetles are chilling.
  hu TS: Tesó, két bogár chillel.
  EN FS: Bro, two snails are chilling.
  hu FS: Tesó, két csiga chillel.
  EN TP: beetles crawling on leaves
  hu TP: leveleken mászó bogarak
  EN FP: beetles flying over flowers
  hu FP: virágok fölött repülő bogarak
2601 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: letérdelni
  EN TS: The man is kneeling in prayer.
  hu TS: A férfi letérdel imádkozni.
  EN FS: The man is sitting in prayer.
  hu FS: A férfi leül imádkozni.
  EN TP: kneeling on stone ground
  hu TP: letérdelve a kőpadlón
  EN FP: kneeling on a soft sofa
  hu FP: letérdelve egy puha kanapén
2602 | ski (verb): to slide over snow on long narrow boards | loc: síelni
  EN TS: They are skiing down so fast.
  hu TS: Olyan gyorsan síelnek lefelé.
  EN FS: They are skiing up so fast.
  hu FS: Olyan gyorsan síelnek felfelé.
  EN TP: skiing down a steep slope
  hu TP: síelés meredek lejtőn
  EN FP: skiing on a flat road
  hu FP: síelés sík úton
2603 | sheet music (noun): printed paper with the notes of a piece | loc: kotta
  EN TS: The sheet music is handwritten.
  hu TS: A kotta kézzel írott.
  EN FS: The sheet music is printed out.
  hu FS: A kotta nyomtatott.
  EN TP: old handwritten sheet music
  hu TP: régi kézzel írott kotta
  EN FP: new printed sheet music
  hu FP: új nyomtatott kotta
2604 | lifeless (adjective): dead-looking, with no life or leaves | loc: élettelen
  EN TS: A lifeless tree, a green moon.
  hu TS: Élettelen fa, zöld hold.
  EN FS: A lifeless tree, a white moon.
  hu FS: Élettelen fa, fehér hold.
  EN TP: a lifeless tree on rocks
  hu TP: élettelen fa a sziklákon
  EN FP: a lifeless potted tree
  hu FP: élettelen cserepes fa
2605 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: karjában ringat
  EN TS: He is cradling a baby.
  hu TS: Egy babát ringat a karjában.
  EN FS: He is cradling a lamb.
  hu FS: Egy bárányt ringat a karjában.
  EN TP: to cradle a baby
  hu TP: babát ringatni a karjában
  EN FP: to cradle a phone
  hu FP: telefont tartani a kezében
2606 | clockwork (noun): machinery of gears and springs inside a clock | loc: óramű
  EN TS: Her head is pure clockwork.
  hu TS: A feje színtiszta óramű.
  EN FS: Her head is pure glass.
  hu FS: A feje színtiszta üveg.
  EN TP: a head full of clockwork
  hu TP: óraművel teli fej
  EN FP: a clockwork toy mouse
  hu FP: óraműves játékegér
2607 | wear (verb): to be dressed in something | loc: viselni
  EN TS: The cats wear formal coats.
  hu TS: A macskák elegáns kabátot viselnek.
  EN FS: The dogs wear formal coats.
  hu FS: A kutyák elegáns kabátot viselnek.
  EN TP: cats wearing long coats
  hu TP: hosszú kabátot viselő macskák
  EN FP: cats wearing collars
  hu FP: nyakörvet viselő macskák
2611 | buckle (noun): the metal fastener that closes a belt | loc: csat
  EN TS: His belt has a metal buckle.
  hu TS: Az övén fémcsat van.
  EN FS: His bag has a metal buckle.
  hu FS: A táskáján fémcsat van.
  EN TP: a metal belt buckle
  hu TP: fém övcsat
  EN FP: buckling a seatbelt
  hu FP: biztonsági öv becsatolása
2612 | bud (noun): a flower that has not opened yet | loc: bimbó
  EN TS: Two buds have not opened yet.
  hu TS: Két bimbó még nem nyílt ki.
  EN FS: Two buds have opened already.
  hu FS: Két bimbó már kinyílt.
  EN TP: two closed red buds
  hu TP: két zárt piros bimbó
  EN FP: two open red buds
  hu FP: két nyitott piros bimbó
2614 | minaret (noun): the tall thin tower of a mosque | loc: minaret
  EN TS: Two boys are near a minaret.
  hu TS: Két fiú van egy minaret közelében.
  EN FS: Two girls are near a minaret.
  hu FS: Két lány van egy minaret közelében.
  EN TP: walking toward a minaret
  hu TP: séta egy minaret felé
  EN FP: climbing up a minaret
  hu FP: felmászás egy minaretre
2618 | handwriting (noun): words written by hand, not printed | loc: kézírás
  EN TS: The handwriting is in cursive.
  hu TS: A kézírás folyóírás.
  EN FS: The handwriting is in print.
  hu FS: A kézírás nyomtatott betűs.
  EN TP: faded cursive handwriting
  hu TP: halvány, folyóírásos kézírás
  EN FP: neat printed handwriting
  hu FP: szép, nyomtatott betűs kézírás
2621 | mast (noun): the tall pole that stands up from a deck | loc: árboc
  EN TS: The mast has lots of rigging.
  hu TS: Az árbocon rengeteg kötélzet van.
  EN FS: The mast has lots of flags.
  hu FS: Az árbocon rengeteg zászló van.
  EN TP: a tall mast with rigging
  hu TP: magas árboc kötélzettel
  EN FP: a mast with pirate flags
  hu FP: árboc kalózzászlókkal
2622 | statue of liberty (noun): a green statue of a woman holding a torch | loc: Szabadság-szobor
  EN TS: A tiny Statue of Liberty!
  hu TS: Egy apró Szabadság-szobor!
  EN FS: A tiny Eiffel Tower!
  hu FS: Egy apró Eiffel-torony!
  EN TP: a mini Statue of Liberty
  hu TP: mini Szabadság-szobor
  EN FP: a Statue of Liberty costume
  hu FP: Szabadság-szobor jelmez
2623 | ivy (noun): a green plant that climbs walls and trees | loc: borostyán
  EN TS: Ivy covers the bookshelf.
  hu TS: Borostyán borítja a könyvespolcot.
  EN FS: Snow covers the bookshelf.
  hu FS: Hó borítja a könyvespolcot.
  EN TP: a bookshelf covered in ivy
  hu TP: borostyánnal borított könyvespolc
  EN FP: a castle covered in ivy
  hu FP: borostyánnal borított kastély
2625 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: mérnök
  EN TS: The engineer dreams of cranes.
  hu TS: A mérnök darukról álmodik.
  EN FS: The engineer dreams of horses.
  hu FS: A mérnök lovakról álmodik.
  EN TP: an engineer's hard hat
  hu TP: egy mérnök védősisakja
  EN FP: an engineer at a computer
  hu FP: mérnök a számítógépnél
2626 | bald (adjective): having no hair on the head | loc: kopasz
  EN TS: A city lives in his bald head.
  hu TS: Egy város él a kopasz fejében.
  EN FS: A farm lives in his bald head.
  hu FS: Egy farm él a kopasz fejében.
  EN TP: a bald head in profile
  hu TP: kopasz fej profilból
  EN FP: a bald head with glasses
  hu FP: kopasz fej szemüveggel
2629 | pigtails (noun): hair tied in two bunches, one each side | loc: copfok
  EN TS: Her hair is in two pigtails.
  hu TS: Két copfba van fonva a haja.
  EN FS: Her hair is in two buns.
  hu FS: Két kontyba van fogva a haja.
  EN TP: two long braided pigtails
  hu TP: két hosszú, fonott copf
  EN FP: two short curly pigtails
  hu FP: két rövid, göndör copf
2631 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: lencse
  EN TS: Her goggles have round lenses.
  hu TS: A védőszemüvegének kerek lencséi vannak.
  EN FS: Her goggles have no lenses.
  hu FS: A védőszemüvegében nincs lencse.
  EN TP: round tinted lenses
  hu TP: kerek, színezett lencsék
  EN FP: a lens on a camera
  hu FP: lencse egy fényképezőgépen
2633 | beam (noun): a line of light shining from something | loc: fénysugár
  EN TS: That tree is a disco. Look at the beams!
  hu TS: Az a fa egy diszkó. Nézd a fénysugarakat!
  EN FS: That tree is a disco. Look at the birds!
  hu FS: Az a fa egy diszkó. Nézd a madarakat!
  EN TP: beams of coloured light
  hu TP: színes fénysugarak
  EN FP: wooden beams of a roof
  hu FP: tetőgerendák
2634 | cork (noun): the round plug that closes a bottle neck | loc: parafa dugó
  EN TS: Every bottle has a cork.
  hu TS: Minden üvegben parafa dugó van.
  EN FS: Every bottle has a straw.
  hu FS: Minden üvegben szívószál van.
  EN TP: bottles closed with corks
  hu TP: parafa dugóval lezárt üvegek
  EN FP: a cork board with notes
  hu FP: parafatábla cetlikkel
2635 | magnolia (noun): a big cup-shaped flower that grows on a tree | loc: magnólia
  EN TS: The magnolia is creamy white.
  hu TS: A magnólia krémfehér.
  EN FS: The magnolia is bright yellow.
  hu FS: A magnólia élénksárga.
  EN TP: an open magnolia flower
  hu TP: nyitott magnóliavirág
  EN FP: a magnolia tree
  hu FP: magnóliafa
2641 | ray (noun): a narrow line of light from a bright source | loc: sugár
  EN TS: Rays are filling the sky!
  hu TS: Sugarak töltik be az eget!
  EN FS: Rays are filling the room!
  hu FS: Sugarak töltik be a szobát!
  EN TP: golden rays of light
  hu TP: arany fénysugarak
  EN FP: rays through a window
  hu FP: sugarak az ablakon át
2648 | ant (noun): a tiny insect that lives in large groups | loc: hangya
  EN TS: This ant is bigger than me!
  hu TS: Ez a hangya nagyobb nálam!
  EN FS: This bee is bigger than me!
  hu FS: Ez a méh nagyobb nálam!
  EN TP: a huge black ant
  hu TP: hatalmas fekete hangya
  EN FP: a huge ant hill
  hu FP: hatalmas hangyaboly
2649 | goggles (noun): big glasses with a band that cover your eyes | loc: védőszemüveg
  EN TS: Those goggles are massive!
  hu TS: Ez a védőszemüveg óriási!
  EN FS: Those earrings are massive!
  hu FS: Ezek a fülbevalók óriásiak!
  EN TP: glowing goggles on her eyes
  hu TP: világító védőszemüveg a szemén
  EN FP: goggles for swimming
  hu FP: úszószemüveg
2651 | spots (noun): small round marks on a surface | loc: pöttyök
  EN TS: The red roof has white spots.
  hu TS: A piros tetőn fehér pöttyök vannak.
  EN FS: The red roof has black spots.
  hu FS: A piros tetőn fekete pöttyök vannak.
  EN TP: a cap with white spots
  hu TP: sapka fehér pöttyökkel
  EN FP: a dog with white spots
  hu FP: kutya fehér pöttyökkel
